I'm not sure if my expectation was too high but it was ok.
Atmosphere: it's a fun environment with lot going on, however if your sitting by the corner window you'll need a pair of sunglasses or you'll be blind!
Food: large portions, I mean large so come hungry.
Unfortunately, few items did come out little on the cold side.
Must of been in waiting.. 2 star  Value: it's a good value considering its on the strip and the portions are large.
3 star  Service: good staff.
Our server was really good all in all.
4 star  Overall, it's ok.
There are some other eateries on the strip that serve similar food that are better.
3 star  Guy was here today!
That's a plus!

So happy to have made it to the grand opening.
Was one of the first few people in line.
Amazing mac & cheese burger.
Specialty drinks off the charts.
both types of fries so tasty.
Guy himself came by our table and said thanks for comming.
I said yes.
Congrats on your grand opening.
He later came by and said you guys are making a mess lol...said i think ive died and gone to guy hevan!
And the smores dessert wow to die for.
Shareable for sure!
Cant wait to get back.

We went the other day for a soft opening and the staff and food were out of this world!
I definitely recommend it to everyone!

Totally awesome place to enjoy some unique cocktails and amazing bites!
Everything from the won-tacos to the Greek salad is mouthwatering.
Service staff is very upbeat and friendly.
Great outfits and a super energetic bar staff.
A must to visit while in Vegas!!!!

I'm a big fan of Guys, my boyfriend and I went there opening night.
The staff was really nice but I think they had to be because Guy was there lol.
The food was OK....
It wasn't nothing to ride home about...
Your better off going somewhere off the Strip, like Nicked City Pizza....

The Mac n cheese bacon burger is one of the best I've had.
Fondue dippers are awesome.
Ambiance is great, menu had plenty to offer, and service was top notch.
Ask for Bria she was great!
Food is reasonably priced, and don't forget your Total rewards card, they discount.

I just had the pleasure of eating at Guy's Vegas Kitchen & Bar.
The food was amazing.
I highly recommend the Triple T fries.
The white truffle cream dip is to die for.
I am so glad I do not live in Vegas.
I would be dining at Guy's every night.

there's only one word to describe this restaurant..... outstanding!
here's another word, amazing!!
the staff, were the best!
very outgoing, all of them from the hostess, bar tender mike, waitress ayron, bus boys all great!!
you gotta come here if your in vegas.
one more thing, omg!!!!
you have to try there desserts!
best in all of vegas

Came here after seeing some promos for it just opening.
Pretty cool vibe to it, with a mix of music from the outside carnival court and music inside.
A little loud for my liking but I get it.
Really friendly staff all around.
I had the mac and cheese burger and it was really good.
Huge portions of everything!!
Wife had the the asian wraps and the pepperoni sticks.
The asian wraps came out cold.
I will try it again down the road.
Overall a decent place for some good food.

Had lunch with the family here for the first time and was better than expected!
We all ordered a different dish and were all pleased with the presentation and quality of the food.
Prices are reasonable for the quality and relaxing atmosphere.
We will definitely return again.
The Staff was really cool and made sure you were well taken care of.

Since this place my wife and I heard about this place opening we were interested in checking it out.
Everything was spectacular from start to finish, our food was phenomenal, I had the Mac n cheese bacon burger and my wife the fireball wings.
We finished with the cheesecake challenge.
Overall the meal was amazing and our server Chris Anderson was awesome!!!
We will be back soon.

My girl friend and I stopped in here to grab a bite to eat for lunch and were not disappointed.
She got the turkey burger and I got the Mac n' Cheese burger.
Both were very delicious and full of flavor.
The sandwiches came with "variety" fries which were seasoned very well.
For being a new restaurant and the strip and celebrity themed I would say that the prices were very fare.
No problem with the service.
Received some suggestions for the menu which seemed a little to "scripted" and not genuine.
Only problem we had was when we were asked where we wanted to sit we asked for inside and ended up getting put right next to the large open doors, which made it a little chilly and not feel like we were inside since it was windy out.
Overall good food, prices, and service.
Would suggest if you are looking for a place that offers a good burger and fries

The service, food, and staff were amazing!
I went here with my family, party of four, during the pre-soft opening where our whole meal was comped.
We were instantly greeted and shown our table.
Although, we weren't seated at the bar, the bartenders made us feel welcome as we passed by.
The service was quick and they managed to make conversation despite being packed.
My glass was never empty and the servers were kind.
We ordered the Big Dipper, Triple T fries, Nachos Del Jefe, General's Wings, Margarita Fajita Wings, and Victor's Sweet Tacos.
And for dessert we had the Triple Doublemint Pie.
We were huge fans of the Margarita Fajita wings, the amazing truffles smothered all over the Triple T fries, Nachos Del Jefe and the Big Dipper.
The sauce for the Margarita Fajita wings was phenomenal.
They almost took this off the menu, but we are so glad that they didn't.
It was a sweet and sour sauce with herbs accompanied with perfectly cooked chicken.
So worth it!
My brother loved the Nachos Del Jefe.
Everyone else at the table enjoyed it, but didn't believe that it was "spectacular".
Everyone at the table loved the Triple T fries.
There were truffles over the fries and within the sauce.
There was so much, we couldn't possibly finish all of it, because the portion size was HUGE (which is a great thing).
The Big Dipper was a great sandwich.
The manager came by to inquire about our experience and he informed us that they spent hours cooking the meat to perfection.
It was seasoned well, and moist.
It's a must try!
Overall, we enjoyed the food, service and staff.
The managers even came by a couple times to personally talk and make us feel welcome while the servers were friendly and consistently checked on us in a pleasant manner.

Since this place my wife and I heard about this place opening we were interested in checking it out.
Everything was spectacular from start to finish, our food was phenomenal, I had the Mac n cheese bacon burger and my wife the fireball wings.
We finished with the cheesecake challenge.
Overall the meal was amazing and our server Chris Anderson was awesome!!!
We will be back soon.

We had Asian wrap appetizers and had two of the sandwiches the pulled pork and the roast beef,.
Sandwiches were hot and the appetizer was really good and tasty.
Love the fries cause it's a combination of four different types, waffle, crinkle, sliced and shoestring very good!
Will come back again....

My husband and I dined at Guy Fieri's Vegas Kitchen and Bar last Friday evening.
The manager Michael welcomed us, and the hostess took us to a nice table.
First I like to mention the Ace Perry Cider that I ordered.
That will be my forever favorite!
What an awesome taste, especially in combination with the tasty menu items!
We ordered the Guy-talian Fondue Dippers and the Righteous Rojo Rings for an appetizer.
We loved it, and couldn't get enough!
Finally something different!
American food but infused with worldly flavors!
Awesome!
We love Chili, so we had to try the Southern Smothered Chili Bowl!
The cornbread on top with the sour cream, yummy!
We give it a 5star!
Another one of my favorite are the Fireball Whiskey Wings.
The blue-sabi sauce that comes with it is divine!
The fries!
OMG!
The best fries I ate in the United States for sure.
They come in different sizes and styles... a must try!
I especially like the unique way the food is presented.
Each menu item has a different kind of set up.
I love eating with my eyes, and I was satisfied for sure.
Big compliment to the entire staff!
Everybody is in a great mood, happy and helpful!
They sure know what the menu items are, and explain it well.
This was my third visit to Guy Fieri's Vegas Kitchen and Bar, and it definitely became one of my favorite American restaurant within one week!

Food: I loved everything we ordered, we were looking for late night food and this place was perfect.
I had the Motley q sand which, which is not just any pulled pork sandwich, it was loaded with tender chunks if meat that melted in your mouth with a fun slaw, awesome sauce, and melted wonderful cheddar on a toasted pretzel bun.
Yum!
Served with 4 kinds of fries, all of them amazing.
Ambiance: what you would expect from Guy, it had personality, not formal, and the wait staff were coordinated, but not in a kitschy way.
service: and this is why I gave them a 3 star rating was spotty at best.
It took 20 minutes to get drinks, then easily took 30 minutes to get our check after they took our plates.
Very strange, but the back up staff kept up with refills, so that was nice.

Watch out everyone Guy Fieri's back in town not as a UNLV student but as a Restaurateur!
This time he's taking no prisoners -- well, no chefs -- because Chefs Bobby Flay and Gordon Ramsay should be quivering and quaking in their boots because, by far, Guy has the best burger in Vegas, especially with the BBQ Bourbon Sauce.
My wife, 11-year-old daughter, and I had an Italian themed day in Vegas.
We  went to Mob Museum (Daughter thought one of the mobsters looked like Actor Robert DeNiro), Rode on a Gondola at the Venetian, went to a Gun Range, and topped it off by eating at the Italian's place Guy Fieri, who is aka Guido.
We started with the Sashimi Won-Taco shareables.
Awesome.
My daughter wanted more --- all of us did.Then, my wife ordered the carne tacos, I ordered a burger and my daughter ordered the pork sandwich.
All were awesome.The mixture of the fries were great!
Though, I'd like a twist on the sauce, say, a kicked up Dill dipping sauce for the fries along with the standard ketchup.
(Fryer Tuck eatery in Portland, OR had that sauce years ago with their wedge-like fries)  Unfortunately, we had a problem.
The dessert.
My wife and I loved the Monte Cristo dessert creation but my daughter had an allergic reaction.
We had asked the waitress if there were any tree nuts in the dessert.
She checked.
The Kitchen told her no.
(I wonder if peanut oil uses any tree nuts.
)  But reaction was just like a reaction she had before with tree nuts.
Her lips became swollen, throat itchy and bumps on her head.
(Several hours past till she was okay again.
)  The waitress immediately got the assistant manager involved.
She was a super waitress, and he was a super man as a manager.
He went way above and beyond the call of duty --- he went to store across the way and purchased Benadyrl for my daughter!
Wow, the assistant manager treated us as if we were Guy, his wife Lori and this had happened to one of Guy's sons Hunter or Ryder.
The manager comped us the $90 bill too!
We left a nice tip for our waitress despite the incident because service and food were excellent.
We will definitely go back for not only the great food but the awesome customer service.
By the way, Guy seems so real and unpretentious like we're part of his family --- and now we witnessed how that attitude spilled over into the attitude of his staff.
Finally, here's a big and heartfelt thank you to Guy, his family and his wonderful staff for taking care of our daughter though it was an unfortunate incident, it made it more palatable for us even if was for the rest of the evening.
We wish Guy, his family and his staff much success with the new "Guy Fieri's Vegas Kitchen and Bar"!
See you next time we're in Vegas!
We will definitely be eating at "Flavortown" again!
By the way, Italians, Food, and Casinos go well together.
Bada bing, Cha Ching!
Guido, you know what I'm sayin'?

This was mine and my boyfriends first visit and we had a great experience.
The food, atmosphere, and service were all outstanding.
I will definitely be recommending this restaurant to my friends and you need to ask for Chris Anderson he was outstanding!

A few nights ago while in Las Vegas we found out Guy Fieri's 'a - Kitchen and Bar-eat place had just opened 6 days earlier.
We had dinner elsewhere But decided to have dessert - OMG the mint pie was awesome for the 2 of us but could easily feed 3 maybe 4 peeps .
Our waiter was Chris Anderson and his helper Angel.
Chris was very informative and friendly.
Chris I could hang with you and learn about the area too- you rock man- thanks for the chat ..... Hubby and I appreciated it much- take care-

This place is horrible, food sucks service is ok nothing crazy.
Maybe it was my server but I was very unhappy about my experience here.

Im in love with this place!!
I watch Guy on tv all the time and he finally opens a new restaurant!
Whoo hoo!
It was better than i anticipated.
I dont really eat american food but this place hands down has the best burgers ive had so far.
First time i had fried ice cream and it was amazing!
They do have salads but if your looking for healthy, this is definitly the wrong place to eat at.
But cheat day go all in!
Everything you love about american food, its fried, its beefy, its sweet, and great portions!

Most amazing day.
Got to the grand opening 3 1/2 hrs early to wait in line got to meet the man himself.
Awesome setting.
Vegas fries trippleTfries and more fries that come with your burger if you choose.
I got the Mac+cheese bug.
uhMazeInggg hello.
Foodies out there this is a must to dine at when in vegas.
Oh and dont get me started on the to die for desserts lol.
The pics will speak better then I can..

I was highly disappointed in the food at guy but then again it's guy's so I guess that says it all .The look of the restaurant was nice and the staff was friendly but I would choose to go to other restaurants Next time.

I'm a fan of Guy Fieri, he's from Vegas and I love his Diners, Drive-ins and Dives so I was excited to try his new restaurant.
The place had a cool casual decor, wood and metal.
Went on a nice Sunday for lunch.
We were seated after about a 20 minute wait.
We ordered our drinks and it came.
Flagging a server was like trying to flag a taxi -- can't find one.
I don't know where our server disappeared to.
After that it took about an hour to get our appetizer which came with our sandwiches and tacos.
Presentation was nice!
I ordered the big dip or whatever it was called -- I can't remember since it's best to forget how dry it was -- it needed au jus which I recommend on the side.
My son ordered the fish tacos.
He said it was plain and not much flavor.
My other son ordered the blackened chicken sandwich or whatever it was again.
It was easy to forget because he said it was just ok.
The truffle fries were great, skinny cut and flavorful.
The server forgot my daughter's water.
She finally got it when our food was brought out.
Service was 1 out of 10.
We ordered another appetizer which never came but were charged and also a beer that we didn't order.
When our server came to bring our check and I told him how bad the service was he started to argue with me and made excuses.
I don't want to hear they just opened 4 days ago.
Apologize, give me a free soda or something for me to return!
Which I won't.
Did he come  to see how we were doing during the hour wait?
Not!
The lunch experience left a bad taste.
We live in Vegas and expect much more from a Strip restaurant especially from Guy Fieri.

Like every other restaurant / bar / club on the Strip, this place is stupidly overpriced, but what do you expect?
I should have known our experience was going to be a bad one when the hostess told my friends and I there was going to be a 40 minute wait when I could clearly see empty tables throughout the place.
As we're waiting, we notice groups of people coming in after us, yet they're getting seated no problem.
One of my friends complains to the hostess and she says, "Oh sorry, I thought you left.
" Seriously?
We eventually get seated and place our orders with an overly excited server.
The restaurant, though busy, isn't packed but for some reason, it takes a while for the food to get there.
I guess the food was so-so, seeing as how some of my friends finished their food while others did not.
We ask for the check and remembering how other reviewers posted to show a Total Rewards card for a discount, I handed my card to the server.
The adjusted bill was a whopping $1.42 cheaper than it would have been had I not given him my card.
Long story short, I really don't see why people love this place.
I might come back if my friends put a gun to my head, but I think I'd rather have them pull the trigger...

My wife and I tried this yesterday.
When we checked in we were told there would be a 40 minute wait, plus we also requested the outdoor patio.
We'd get called around 25 minutes, but they forgot about the patio request and wanted to seat us inside.
We eventually got the patio seating.
Once seated, service was on the slow side.
We ordered drinks, I got the Sammy Hagar rum drink, which was very good.
But our order was not taken until we got our drinks after a long wait.
We ordered hamburgers, I got the Mac and Bacon Burger.
I took about 30 mins to come out.
The burgers are smash burger style, and unfortunately ours were on the over done side.
The burger is described as an award winning burger, but not in this case.
The Mac and cheese was stingily applied and could not overcome the dryness of an overdone burger.
During the whole time there, when visits from the server were few and far between, there were about six people getting a table ready for a group of 15.
Must have been a VIP, because it was setup meticulously.
I've never seen that much cleaning and rechecking of the setup before.
Maybe if they put that much attention to the rest of the customers, it would have been a better experience.
Since it's only been open a week, hopefully things will get better.
But with so many choices for good food in Vegas, it's hard to give places a second chance.

I'm a huge Guy Fiery fan!
This guy always makes my mouth water every time it watch his show!
And to have him open a restaurant in Vegas!
Now that's amazing you know your not in for a disappointment!
With that said, I ordered the tatted up turkey burger now that was a huge juicy burger!
I loved it and I couldn't finish it!
The menu had a verity of food to chose from I'll definitely be back to try other foods!

Great food and fun atmosphere.
The fireball whiskey wings were really good.
Great burgers, great desserts, wonderful menu.
Can be a bit pricey for a casual restaurant but the location is wonderful.
If you have a Total Rewards players card, you get $1 off your entree.
I will go back to try other menu items!

This place is amazing!!!
The environment, the decor, the customer service, and the food are all on point!
I got the chili and an order of fries, they were both delicious!
We are outside, which was perfect and very comfortable.
The prices are unbeatable for being a celebrity restaurant.
I will absolutely be back next time I'm in town, and I've already told all my family and friends that they have to check this place out!
Can't wait to come back, and the staff were all super friendly.

Like the show "DDD", but had no idea if Fieri was a talented chef or not.
If his menu at this place is any indication, he won me over.
The chx wings were fun to look at and eat.
The flavor is spot on.
The pulled pork sandwich was great.....the pork was tender and the barbecue flavor fabulous; the best I've had in a long time and I'm no real fan of BBQ.
The kitchen was a bit slow and some of the pork portions were crunchy, but those are daily kitchen issues and nothing to do with the menu or the flavors.......I'd go again and try more of the menu, definitely.

Let me start off by saying we had a great server Nicole.
She was fantastic and so much fun!
The appetizer ahi won ton tacos I think were amazing!!
So many different flavors.
Loved them!
Husband had Motley Q, he was in heaven.
Loved every bit of it.
I cant say enough about the fries....just the thought I want to go back now!
Homemade ketchup was great, not sweet like store brands.
I dont remember name of what I had but was so good.
It had an au jus with it.
There was so much food we could have eaten ourselves into a coma.
Everything with food was perfect!
We were so full we could not eat any dessert.
Though they all looked like the bomb.com!!!
Drinks from the bar I have to say were not so good.
They were thrown together and probably worst we've had.
There were no garnishments on any 5 drinks.
Bloody Mary was literally tomatoe juice & vodka.
Was so boring that my husband gave bartender a recipe to make for him.
Was much better but still no garnishment.
No olives, no celery, nothing.
We did talk to general manager about it and he did take care of the issue.
Assistant manager came by & we made suggestions on the drinks.
He did say every drink is to come with garnishment.
Both managers were awesome and had great attitudes and asked us personal questions about our visit to Las Vegas.
They seemed very sincere.
We definitely will go again when in Vegas!!
We so LOVE LOVE this restaurant!!
Wish I could give 5 stars but because of the drinks I had to give 4 stars.
Thank you Guy for opening this great restaurant!!
Thank you Managers & Nichole for giving us such a wonderful experience!!
p.s.~ we also went to Gordon Ramseys in Paris and between the two, Guy's restaurant was by far the best!!

I went there with my friends on their first day opened.
I like how they have partial outdoor area.
Staffs are very friendly.
Food presentation were nice .
We tried chicken wings ,fish taco and churro.
Churro was real good.
I want to go back and try the cheese cake because I saw the waitress brought it to the other table and it was like half of the plate size.
Atmosphere was fun too.

Its about time that a 5 Star chef came to town with a moderate priced place to eat.
Guy's place ROCKS!
Showed up at 6 pm on a Tuesday and we were seated right away.
Our server was fast to take our order with a wonderful smile and helpful information regarding the food.
My choice, Mac N Cheese and Bacon Burger.
My husband got the Big Dipper Sandwich, smoked roast beef.
My burger was out of this world, mac n cheese, perfectly cooked bacon, lettuce, cheese and a juicy burger.
The burger and all sandwiches are served with a side of assorted fries.
The only small thing I would have changed was the plating, its a small item.
The plating is done on a small wooden cutting board which doesn't leave a lot of room for your food.
Now my husbands sandwich, not our favorite, but that's a personal taste.
The roast beef was had a VERY HEAVY smoke to it.
Neither of us are huge fans of a heavy smokey taste to our beef/BBQ.
The meat was tender and juicy, just didn't care for the heavy smoke.
Total bill was $44 for both meals with included 2 pops.
Price isn't bad for a casual dinner on the Las Vegas Strip from a 5 Star chef.
Can wait for friends to come into town so we have an excuse to go back.

The wait time of 30min on a Sunday evening was long considering there were empty tables available.
Not enough staff?
The servers were very friendly.
At the end of the meal, I got a survey on the whole experience including the wait staff.
Is that why they were overly friendly?
Newly trained employees.
The food was ok.
I had the Triple B burger and Greek salad.
I probably won't return anytime soon.

This awesome, new, rocking place put Gordon Ramsay's Pub (for one) to shame.
Friendly service, amazing food.
Decent pricing.
The front area is crammed as hell and really bottlenecks with people waiting in line vs. the people trying to leave.
It is only 2 weeks old on this date so of course the place is jammed and you may have to sit at the bar for 45 min to wait for a table.
(awwww, right?
)  The staff will text you when your table is ready!
There are plenty of TVs to watch your fave game at the bar.
A must try is the guava cocktail with chili beer.
The restaurant has a huge patio and is a great lunch spot also.
You cannot be in a hurry when you come here.
The food and drink takes a bit but I am sure there are kinks still being worked out and the wait IS WORTH IT!
We ordered the shrimp lava tacos which our party gave a 3.5 out of 5, my other friend and I ordered the infamous, award winning mac and cheese burger (4 star).
I was so excited to try it, I forgotten I had had a little burger already today at lunch elsewhere!
Oh well - it was amazing and the kitchen even split it for us on 2 massive plates when they knew we were sharing.
(no charge) The fries were so good,fresh, crisp and had 3 different types!
What a treat!
The burger was cheesy-rich but thank GOD we shared it.
We also shared a Chinese salad (5 star) that had everything you would possibly want in it and the presentation was genius!
Indescribable!
The manager came by to see how everything was and was very gracious.
Guy Fieri will be in tomorrow (May 2) night and Sat at lunch.
Dammit, we are going to miss him, our loss!
My favorite thing about this place is how most things have a spicy flair to them, food and drink!
Lots of sharables, salads, sandwiches, burgers and tacos - that is what you will find here!
Great atmosphere, cannot wait to come back!

Great customer service best ive had in vegas and awesome food.
would recommend to anyone

The food was OKAY.
Nothing to write home about.
I had the smash burger and it literally tasted like in and out.
The fries were way too crispy and burnt.
The only thing that made this visit worthwhile was the amazing waitress we had.
I believe her name was Olga!
Won't be coming back anytime soon.

Wow!
This place rocks!
The bartenders were awesome!
They were very attentive and knew the menu inside and out!
We saw the manager on the floor talking to different tables.
The food was outstanding!
We couldn't have been happier!
Thanks Guy!

Was here on 4/26/14 with family and friends.
This was my first and much anticipated visit to a Guy Fieri restaurant and it far exceeded my expectations!
Our waitress, Michelle, was friendly, energetic and informative  she knew the menu very well (for only being open one week!
) and was able to make great suggestions.
I had the Vegas fries and the blue-sabi sauce they came with was off the charts.
My main course was the pastrami burger that was AMAZING!!
Even two of my sons, who are very picky eaters, were totally impressed with the bacon Mac n cheese burger.
My wife had the carne Asada tacos that she said were some of the best she's ever had!!!
The entire experience was awesome and I am already looking forward to our next visit!

Just went last week while visiting Vegas.
They had only been open 3 weeks.
The Good: Friendly staff Great house Sammy Hagar rum drink.
Good to great food (tossed buffalo fries and mac n cheese burger)  Needs Work: Service was SLOOOW.
Took 90 minutes for dinner.
Burger overcooked.
Problem seems to be difficulty the wait staff has getting food out of the kitchen and drinks out of the bar.
Wait staff would disappear but always seemed to come flying back out of the little bar nook where they were held up waiting for customer's drinks.
Guys next to us waited 15 minutes for a beer.
One beer.
That's a flow problem for MANAGEMENT to fix.
And it NEEDS to be fixed.
Loved the buffalo tossed fries.
Interesting shapes and not too much sauce.
Burger would have been good but was overcooked.
They don't ask how you want it, which should have been the first clue.
They're all well done.
I'd try it again.
Atmosphere was good and waitstaff was friendly and attentive.

at the Quad, started off with Guy-Talian Fondue Dippers...delicious!
Followed by Original off-da-hook Smash burger...delicious!
Customer service excellent.
Atmosphere was fun!
Should of participated in the beer sampler with tshirt...next time!
We will be back...

Last meal in Vegas before we have to fly home to idaho.
You know that saying save the best for last?
Well that is the case with Guys restaurant.
Was not disappointed at all.
Even our son said we need to come back here again after eating the drunken fish tacos.
The mac n cheese bacon burger was legit.
Turn into Harras to park and wind your way back to the Quad.
Once you Valet park it is right there.
Winner winner chicken dinner.

i love GF and enjoy his shows on food network so i'm glad we were able to go to his new place.. i was worried it wouldn't be open in time cuz the place's opening date was supposed to be 'late april' so we lucked out really.. anyway, the decor and attire of the staff was very rock-cowboyish, and i was enjoying the general ambiance and environment.. the bar yells out when various events happen, like some patron is celebrating something, etc, it was hard to understand what the bartenders were yelling lol.. and there's an outside patio option for diners if they choose, BUT the down side to this is it's a big open wall so w/ it being a restaurant, flies and whatnot just roam freely throughout the place and chow down, very much interrupting diners like myself!
so my suggestion would be to fix up that wall and make it a revolving door instead and just have outside speakers if u want the outside diners to still hear the music lol.. i ordered The Ultimate Asian Chicken Wraps app, and in general, it was a good deal, yums all around.
then i got the big dipper sandwich, and omgosh, the whole plating thing was WEIRD and i was not a fan!
but b4 that, i found out that the sandwich has cheese caked on it, so i couldn't even peel it off, so they redid it w/o cheese and at no extra charge which i appreciated.. but yeah, the sandwich is a sub type w/ a bunch of prime rib meat stuffed into it lol (it had a weird smell but the meat tasted good lol, the bread got a bit soggy tho so i just ate the meat lol), it also came w/ a variety of fries w/ added flavor, and a big ass pickle (i'm a fan of certain pickles so i didn't mind and chomped on).
so like i said, the whole plating of the sandwich was very awkward and messy.
it's served on a cutting board type of 'plate' and it's cluttered like crazy w/ sauces in the corners, this weird downward slide for fries lol, and the sub that in my case was covered in thin onion rings which i just put to the side, oh and a big knife was stuffed underneath the sub for ur 'convenience' lol.. whoever thought this plating would be a good idea was an idiot, IMO, i would've much preferred a regular plate!
the whole plating deal they did was just messy and i got crumbs everywhere... so while i'm eating, i noticed all the diners around me keep asking the servers about GF and his personality/appearances at the restaurant lol.. of course the servers are gonna say he's a great guy and whatnot, he's their ultimate boss!
but yeah i may have been the only one who didn't do that lol, but i'm not gonna lie, it would've been cool as hell to see the guy in person that i watch on tv a lot lol.. anyway, the end came and there's an option to do a customer satisfaction survey which i appreciated.
it's a lil handheld device inside the check booklet lol, i thought that was particularly creative and i hope GF/the management takes my comments seriously.

Nick L. Is the bomb, very attentive/informative.
The mayor of flavortown is aptly named.
#thebomb.

Took my mom and brother to check out this new spot by guy fieri.
Really nice spot but things weren't exactly working smooth.
They had just opened 10 days prior so I'll blame it in having to get all the kinks out.
I ordered the dipping sandwhich which had extremely hard bread and was piled on way too high making it impossible to even dip.
Not good.
However my brother ordered the Mac and cheese hamburger which was amazing...as well as the churros we had for dessert.
They messed up on the bill big time so they are going to comp my meal next time.
Hopefully it's a lot better.
-Joe

This was our first time in as we wanted to give a few weeks since the opening to work out the kinks.
Pros: Excellent portion size Fries actually COME with your burger!
You won't leave hungry Service was good Food was better than expected  Cons: Small place, if you go during busy dinner hour, you will definitely wait a long time The bar takes up much of the restaurant VERY salty food Pricey for a burger place but the size of the food seems to make up a bit for it, but you will still spend at least $17 on a burger and $4 on a soda If you like Iced Tea like I do, you will be disappointed that they use machine tea rather than fresh brewed (GUY, how could you let this happen????
)  The burgers were nicely cooked but REALLY salty.
My Off-Da-Hook Burger was missing the onion rings on it, the MAIN component!
When I requested to have the onion rings put on it, they brought me out ONE ring.
REALLY?
For a $19 burger?
We will definitely go again at some point as all in all, not a bad place but we wish they would reduce the salt on everything.
Still surprised to see that Guy would allow machine Iced Tea instead of fresh brewed though (and it was $4.).
Makes me almost wonder where the other short cuts may be in the kitchen.
I recommend giving it a try as you will not leave hungry as I have in the past with another recent celeb chef burger place.............

Honestly the best burger I've ever had.
Mac and cheese burger.
Comes with four different types of fries.
Ask for a side of ranch for the fries.
Creamy and garlicky.
YUM!
A must go when in vegas.
Aside from the food the atmosphere was great and the staff was very friendly.
Oh and love the skull napkins.
Had to buy a pair to take home.

I ate here while staying in the quad hotel with my boyfriend we wanted something close by and it looked like a nice restaurant.
We didn't have too much time to wait.
The waiter was very nice we both had a big lunch so wanted something small and not too much carbs so went with the chilli.
I just had a few spoonfuls and my stomach started to feel really sick couldn't eat any more might have been too spicy and salty.
My boyfriend ate all of his but spent the night extremely ill I felt really sorry for him.
I won't be racing back to try the chilli it needs to be improved.

Let me start with saying the service was excellent.
It did take longer than I think it should have to get seated by the hostess for it not to be crowded.
But not a crazy wait and they were nice.
I had the Original Smash Burger and my friend had the Tatted Turkey Burger.
The meat patties are larger than the bun.
They also come with assorted french fries which I love.
My burger was delicious however if I order a burger again I would order it Medium as all burgers are made medium well.
I wish my burger had more bbq sauce on it, however I devoured it so fast I didn't have time to ask for an extra side.
The turkey burger was good as well but not as good as the the smash burger.
The portions are healthy so unless you are with a group it is hard to even want to order and appetizer.
We shared the fried ice cream sundae.
A terrific idea, since I love deep fried ice cream and think the best one comes from El Torito when they use chocolate chip ice cream.
The idea was good execution poor.
It comes with a side of caramel syrup, chocolate syrup, whipped cream, bananas and peanut butter, pineapple, and strawberries.
All the sides were great it was just the fried shell was not up to par.
The cornflakes were bland and seemed stale tasting.
Maybe needing to be fried longer or something.
It just wasn't what I hoped for.
Regardless my inner fatboy still devoured it.
I would definitely come back I want to try the Triple T fries along with some other dishes.
You can also use your Total Rewards Card to pay for your bill so that was great all I had to do was leave the tip.

Our server Adrian, was well versed in the ingredients of cocktails and all entrees.
Manager Stephanie even added more details about Guy's and ensured we had a fantastic birthday celebration at our table of 5.
Presentation and quality of food was outstanding.
See pictures on this site for details.
Great night.

This was my favorite burger place in Vegas hands down!
The fireball whiskey wings are a must!
Trust me you'll love it.
You can't go wrong with any burger.
The tacos portion were a bit small in my opinion so I would stay away from those...
I'm sure they're delicious but they don't come with the fries.
Service was great but they didn't get the five stars because getting our food and getting seated took forever.
They didn't answer when we tried to make reservations either.
But this place is a great spot for a burger!

Great joint!
I really enjoyed their food and their overall ambiance.
The restaurant opened not too long ago so the wait for a table is ridiculous during the weekend and unfortunately they do not allow reservations.
The restaurant decor is great and I love the employees uniforms, they are super cute!
We ordered the macaroni and cheese burger and the carne asada tacos!
They were both great!
The bread was soft, the meat very juicy and the overall flavor was exquisite.
The only bad part was the taster flights.. For $35 you get 4oz tasting of 16 beers.
The bad part is that the "tasting" included ordinary beers such as blue moon, PBR, miller light, sierra Nevada well you get the idea.
Who has not sampled those cheap beers before!
I felt like it was a joke!
The good part is that you get a T-shirt!
I would totally recommend this place!

Everything is BIG at Guy's Vegas Kitchen & Bar.
Most vegas restaurants don't always live up to the hype that's built up around them.
This place had only been opened couple weeks when i went and was overpacked.
From the moment you walk in, you see Guy's portrait and books to remind you of where you are.
But it's the little touches that makes this place unique.
Napkins themed with spanish Dia de Muertos art to big wooden clipboard menus.
It's different with a unique touch of style  The food is out of bounds as you might expect.
Big burgers to giant onion rings served on a metal pipe rack.
The cocktails did not dissapoint and i suggest you try some of them.
The star of the night was their peperoni wrapped breadstick fondue.
I ordered their champion Mac n Cheese burger and it was huge!
burger was decent but the meat could have been seasoned better.
Finally we ended up sharing the recommended fried ice cream sundae, which is a masterpiece.
I will be returning to Guy's restaurant and that's saying alot since the choices are usually endless in Vegas.
The atmosphere is electirc and the staff is great.
I'm impressed with the new Linq area and this restaurnt surrounded by the Quad is a nice addition to the Vegas night life.

We were seated quickly.
The staff was very friendly.
My husband ordered the 67 cajun sandwich.
He liked the sandwich but was disappointed that it was not as spicy as described on the menu.
My sandwich was very delicious as well... No disappointments for me.
The assortment of fries was pretty neat.
We were both very impressed by the iced tea.
Generally we drink or tea sweetened but the tea was so delicious that we didn't need to add sugar.
We would suggest trying this dig.

Decided to grab a bite here before our High Roller experience.
I ordered the drunken fish tacos....one word: delicious!
I tried  a piece of my sisters burger and it was just as delicious as the tacos.
I loved how there side order of fries came with a variety of fries (straws, waffle and steak fries).
I underestimated this restaurant and I would highly recommend trying this restaurant out when in Vegas!

Service was great first off!
The Quad still smells like the old IP though.
Cocktails were great the "lemon drop martini-not"was really good.
It's good..really it's just called lemon martini-not.
We orderedthe wonton sashimi tacos and those were AMAZEBALLS!
The lollipop chicken wings were also quite good.
We got the Parmesan garlic kind.
The burger w/Mac cheese was so-so but not bad at all.
3 stars because he failed on the smores dessert!
It seemed like a big slab of carb infused with not so chewy marshmallows and chocolate sauce...I didn't taste any graham cracker at all because it was all fried up and was really soggy.
Definitely a big fat "F" more like epic fail!
All in all pretty cool spot for bar bites!

All the food is great.
I've never hard a bad meal at any of his restaurants.
The service was wonderful.
I had the chicken tacos & the wife had the pulled...pork sandwich.
Both were delicious!
We also had dessert which was fantastic.

I would give this place 5 stars if I thought I'd get away with it!
Was looking for a great burger for my birthday feast and was amazed with the Mac and cheese burger,, so good!!
The service was top notch despite having a young crew and manager Melanie personally came by and checked on me a few times.
That's how service is done and this place is in my top ten for sure.
Thanks for the birthday shot as well Nick!

Burgers, Tacos, Wings, & Beer.. everything you'd expect from a diners, drive-ins, & dives professional!
The Quad is really starting to shape into an attractive Vegas casino.. as long as you don't see their hotel rooms.
haha The addition of Guy Fieri's restaurant, along with Hash House, really steps up the food game in this area of the strip..  Food: Going through the menu, there weren't a lot of fancy-shmancy ingredients or toppings.. just your classic all-American foods assembled into fantastic combinations.
I decided to go with the Mac+Cheese Bacon Burger.. the ultimate burger throw-up!
The patty: very thin but wide, coming out of the burger covering the entire bottom bun.. while the bacon and mac&cheese slightly oozed out on top of the patty.
This is the true definition of a "beautiful mess".
Very tasty burger, loved the 5-cheese mac&cheese and the simple "backyard BBQ" grilled type of burger.
The fries that came with the burger came in 3 types: ridged, curly, and wedges.. awesome!
We also ordered the Triple-T fries which was like truffle overload with gouda.
We didn't get to try any of the specialty cocktails.. there were many interesting concoctions that we'll definitely try next time.
Ambiance: I'd describe it as an Ed Hardy-themed restaurant.. even the napkins had skulls.
haha.
A lively restaurant with high, exciting energy.
If you're there for lunch, definitely sit outside.. you get the view of the walkway between Harrah's and The Quad, and the front of Caesars.
I'm not sure how it is at night but probably crazy loud with Harrahs' Carnival court right next door.
Service: Staff was great.. there were two consistent servers continually checking on us.
It was a bit of a wait for our food to come out but I give them a little leeway since the restaurant's still brand new.
Tips: Don't pass up this place if you're torn on what to eat on the strip.
Grab a burger, a few drinks, and enjoy!

Fabulous food both in presentation and taste.
Excellent service.
Only complimented an only added to a great night.

The decor, service, and food were all on point!!
I am so glad that I ate dinner here tonight.
We ordered the Mac n cheese burger and the original, and split them.
Both were awesome!
Juicy and flavorful, pretty much perfect.
Our server was Chris and he was awesome.
I cannot saying anything bad.
Try this place out, just skip the appetizer.
There is plenty of food without it.

Menu, decor & atmosphere reflect the man.
We went with friends & shared the Chinese take out salad & a Burger.
The kitchen was kind to split the burger for us.
Food was fresh & good portion sized.
Our daughter wants to try it so we will be back...don't know why NY bashed him but his menu is more West Coast flavor

I LOVED the atmosphere in this place.
The view into the kitchen had me staring at the cooks making, prepping and sending out orders like crazy.
The staff was super friendly and great to look at.
They were all upbeat and talkative too.
I got the Mayor of Flavortown Burger with fries.
Honestly, I was hungover and nauseous from the night before which is probably why I didn't appreciate the food as much as I did.
Looking at all the food coming out I wish I had a chance to go back and try everything.

One word...awesome!
I loved their system of texting you when your table was ready.
Our server was phenomenal.
It did take a while to get our cocktail drinks.
But our food came out fast, I'm glad we didn't order any appetizers!
I had the mac & cheese bacon burger.
It was everything I thought it could be and more.
It was just delicious and I highly recommend it.
It's cooked medium well but was still really juicy and loved the mix of fries you receive with it.
It's a big burger and will get messy, but you will enjoy it!
My friend had the turkey burger and she liked hers as well.
It was a great time, and the staff was very friendly.
Thanks Guy!

Came here with a friend last week.
Wait time was about 45 minutes, but at least they text you when your table is ready so you can wander or gamble.
When we got the text we were seated promptly.
Our table was in the patio which was nice, but the band at Carnival was a bit too loud (luckily they only had a few songs left before the end) and the table was slanted/wobbily.
I cracked a joke about it with the waiter, but he just made a comment saying it wasn't so bad.
We had issues where if one of us took our hand off the table it would lean to the otherside possibly spilling our drinks.
Onto the food.
We split an order of General Tso's lollipop wings which were great!
They came with crystalized peanuts, wasabi peas, and brown rice chips to dip them in.
I really wanted to try some wings here after seeing the pictures of it, unfortunately these were the only ones that sounded appetizing.
I wanted some more traditional spicy wings, but the closest one to that was the Fireball wings (which I'm not a fireball fan) and they had spicy bbq sauce on it.
I'm glad we got the general tso's.
Main course we both got burgers and split them.
We got the Mac'n'Cheese burger and the other one I forgot the name for (onion rings, kicker sauce, and bbq sauce).
Both were good, I was worried the Mac'n'Cheese burger would be way too heavy and it wasnt overloaded with it.
Overall the food was great, the service was good, the only complaint I really have is that slanted table we got.
I would definately come back to try some of the other offersings.

Awesome service and food!!!
Had this place for the first time yesterday and now it'll be on the calendar at least a few times a month!
The chili was the best I've had EVER!
The fish tacos were fresh and full of flavor!
If you're a local or just visiting it's definitely worth trying!!
Make sure you get the chili!

So let me first tell you I love Guy Fieri so much, so I had to visit his new restaurant.
The atmosphere is great with cool decor and amazing service.
We sat at the bar because unfortunately they do not take reservations.
But the bartenders who helped us were hilarious and very attentive.
It was my friends 21st birthday and they gave us some free shots.
We first ordered the fireball chicken wings and they were one of my favorite things, such a good spicy sweet hot sauce.
We also had the nachos and crispy tuna tacos and they were okay, I would skip those.
But the Mac and cheese burger was soooooo good with crispy bacon and amazing gooey mac and cheese.
Oh and last but not least we had the cheesecake with potato chips and pretzels that was absolutely amazing, I have an obsession with salty sweet desserts.
Hands down I would go here anytime I'm in Vegas at the end of the trip, because you will leave stuffed and feel very snorlax/ whale like and all that fat will help soak up the liqueur from the days before that you can't remember.

Ate here in May 2014.
Delish!!!!
A group of 4 ordered the nachos.
They are amazing and enough for 4.
I then had the Mac n cheese burger - bc really, I was at Guy Fieri's restaurant and felt I had to.
It was AMAZING!!
You might want to walk for an hour or so afterwards b/c its a million calories.. but very worth it :)   Highly recommend this place!

Great food from a funny guy.
Everyone loves food but no one loves making food to share more then Fieri.
Took my wife there for lunch had a great Lagunitas on tap superb.
Onion rings, wings, mayor burger it was all great.
Happy wife, happy life Service was great will be back next time in town.

I went here last night with my boyfriend just to try out something new.
Plus he heard from one of his coworkers that it was great.
I had the mac & cheese burger.
I asked the server how it is & he told me it's their #1 best seller, so I decided to try it out.
It was amazing!
I already love mac & cheese by itself, but on a burger?
It was amazing.
My boyfriend had the original burger (don't remember what it was called) but it was really good & full of flavor.
It was first on the list though.
We also had their little fish tacos as an appetizer.
That was also really good for a starter.
Anyways, it was amazing & I would definitely go again.

2 words: FOOD POISONING!!!
Let me start this by saying that I do not drink alcohol so that y'all don't think it was alcohol poisoning.
I ordered the burger that had bleu cheese.
I'm not quite sure what it was called, but i know it was $18.00.
I also ordered the Vegas Fries as an appetizer for our table to share.
The fries were nothing special.
They are wedge cut and come with some sort of ranch dressing on the side.
I really only ordered them because I LOVE bleu cheese.
As soon as I bit into my burger, I told everyone sitting with me that the burger was not good.
It was extremely dry and the meat was soooo thick it was hard to chew and even harder to swallow.
Anywho, I did not like the burger but I ate it anyway because I was starving.
I couldn't finish it because it was soooo dry.
So I left a little less than half.
I was completely unsatisfied but I did not care enough to send it back.
We paid and went on our merry way to enjoy our last night in Sin City.
I got back to the room and a few hours later I had to run to the bathroom to throw everything up.
I'm sorry if this is too much info but it's what happened.
I threw up 4 times and all 4 times it was the hamburger patty and the bleu cheese.
It was the worst feeling ever.
And then a little something else hit me, but I won't mention that.
Around my eye area, I saw that I was starting to develop these little red dots all over and a little above my forehead.
It had to have been an allergic reaction to the bad meat.
Now I thought it was just me, but that morning when we were heading down to valet, one of the girls who was in our party but staying in a different hotel told me she threw up 3 times and it was ALL of the burger.
She had the same burger as I did.
Coincidence?
I think not.
2 nights before, we had eaten at Gordon Ramsay's BURGR, and I had also ordered a burger with bleu cheese and I was perfectly fine.
I hate to base my review on my experience but I can guarantee I'll never go back because just the thought of walking by there makes me sick to my stomach.
I had to catch a flight back and I was terrified of not making it to the bathroom in time in case it hit me again.
I will say this, even before I got sick, I did not like the taste of any of the food.
Sorry for the TMI but I just needed to get this out there.

My Moms first trip to Vegas and we both really love Guy.....so when we saw that his restaurant had just opened about 30 days prior.....the service was great we were seated right away and got to sit on the patio which was great with the weather.
Our waiter was very informative on the menu and suggested the pepperoni wrapped breadsticks with cheese fondu.
We love them!!
I will be back just to have them!
We also spit the drunken fish tacos and they had such a depth of flavor with all the ingredients.
Remember to show your rewards card from the Total Rewards Program and save some $ we will be back....my husband must visit!

Unexpectedly good burgers.
And no, I'm not a fan of celeb laden shoddy restaurants.
Who would think that Guy Fieri could do better than Hubert Keller of Burger Bar, Gordon Ramsay BurGR, or Bobby's Burger Palace?
But that's exactly what happened to me here.
Try and let me know if you disagree.

I'm such a big fan of Guy Fieri & his shows!
After hearing that he has his own restaurant in Vegas, I knew I had to check it out!
Definitely that "All-American" feel to it!
Live TV, loud music, and a great space!
Upon walking in, the greeting and the hostesses, I felt, were awkward.. We were seated and our server was Olga.
She was pleasant and attentive!
Now about the food.. Portions are big, quality is good, but the items don't scream "to die for".. We had : * Java Guava - guava juice cocktail with a touch of alcohol * Parmaggedon Wings - brined and roasted Parmesan wings served with marinara sauce -- very tender, moist, flavorful wings!
* Triple T Fries - truffle fries sprinkled with truffle served with truffle sauce -- def not as truffley as it sounds.. * Drunken Fish Tacos - tilapia, avocado and fresh veggies -- nothing too impressive.. * Mac N Cheese Burger - bacon, mac n cheese served on a brioche bun -- DELICIOUS!
* Mexican Churros - fried churros with two dips : spicy chocolate & dulce de leche (my fave of the two!
)   Two other things -- they have big chunks of squared ice in the drinks which lasted forever, kept my water nice and cold!
AND the side of ranch we had was AMAZING!
Just the little, simple things that topped off the experience!
Overall pleased with the service and food!
Wouldn't mind coming back to try the other menu items!

I'm a huge fan of DDD and Guy Fieri, so I was excited to try the newest addition to the Quad Resort and Casino.
Food: The menu is pretty much your regular burgers, tacos, wings but definitely with a gourmet twist.
We went with the Mac and Cheese Bacon Burger.
We originally had it cut in half to share, but it was crazy messy.
The patty is pretty thin but super wide...way wider than the bun.
The burger itself was really tasty, complete with the gooey mac and cheese and crispy bacon.
I really liked the fries that was served with the burger.
There were different types: curly, ridged, wedges, and I'm sure I found a regular fry in there as well.
We also ordered the Triple-T fries which was just as it was described: Truffle+truffle+more truffle!
Loved the truffle flavor and the shoestring style fries.
We didn't get to really try anything else because we were so full, but I definitely want to try their cocktails and dessert next time.
Ambiance: Alan L. described it perfectly: Ed Hardy-themed.
And an extra touch of rocker style.
The indoor seating area seemed a little small, but I would recommend sitting outdoors.
The outdoor seating area sits right next to the walkway between the Quad and Harrah's.
You definitely get a good view of people walking right by.
Hopefully they see your meal and suddenly get a craving for some good burgers.
Service: The staff was fantastic!
Our servers were attentive and helpful.
We did have to wait for our food but the restaurant was about a week old and they were pretty busy that day.
Tips: Try out this place if you're wanting an overall good dining experience on the strip.
And definitely opt for outdoor seating!

Awesome rings with kicked up ketchup.
Husband had Carne Asada street tacos and I had Tatted Up Turkey Burger.
Both were really good.
Burger was big and with shredded lettuce a bit messy, just saying.
Didn't stop me from eating it though.
Could only finish half with the rings.
Husband finished tacos (four small ones).
Service was friendly and timely.
Would go again.

This place put me in a food coma, in the best way.
Everything was melt in your mouth excellence.
Even the Dragon's Breath tasted like candy.
Mac and Cheese Burger was on point,  as well as the S'mores Monte Cristo.
I had to sit at the bar, but the experience was undwindled.
A definite recommend, but bring your appetite and your wallet.

Beyond disappointed and embarrassed to have taken my boyfriend's parents here last night.
I'm a huge fan of Guy Fieri and was bummed to miss his Yelp Elite event last month, and was so excited to try this place.
Epically backfired.
GET THIS:  Triple T Fries are delish, but don't eat the "creamy white truffle dip"- no flavor, seems to be sour cream.
Oh, and they're $14, so consider yourself warned.
The hefeweizen beer featured on the current menu is also damn delicious.
Too bad it took 20 minutes and half of our meal to get to us.
DON'T GET:  MORGAN'S GREEK SALAD is plated poorly and difficult to cut up and eat the full romaine leaves.
Only one piece of feta in the entire dish, fell off the plate due to the plating issue and was unable to eat it.
The dressing was citrusy and not at all appealing.
Only Greek components of this salad were the feta I couldn't eat and a handful of olives.
There was no hummus in this dish as listed on menu, and the croutons were soggy.
The MAYOR OF FLAVORTOWN is a dry burger with pastrami of questionable quality.
Somehow it looked like brisket with a dark color and odd taste.
The Dijon mustard was also flavorless.
Served with crinkle-cut sweet potato fries that looked and tasted like they were from the grocery store bulk bag.
Did not finish.
MAYBE TAKE A GABLE: DOUBLE BARREL BBQ WINGS are cut lollipop style, which was visually pleasing and easier for my bf's dad to consume, and Guy's signature bourbon brown sugar bbq sauce was neither bold nor flavorful, making it even more palatable for a guy who hates spice but couldn't find anything else on the menu he wanted to take a gamble on.
Good dish for the person who ordered it, but not something I can recommend.
Service was also awful.
As mentioned above, we waited 20 minutes for our beers.
That is simply unacceptable.
We also ordered a margarita that tasted like lemonade and did not seem to have any liquor in it- sent it back.
Should have sent everything back, but at 1AM our options were limited, I didn't want to make a scene in front of my potential future in-laws, and quite frankly, we never saw our server.
Receipt came in an iPhone holder, with the device, to complete a dining experience survey about our visit.
I would have loved to.
But the iPhone was out of battery and shut off.
Seriously?!
I am so embarrassed to have suggested this place and will not be recommending it.
Bad service + bad food = bad experience.

If you're looking for Flavortown, you'll find it right between Mediocreville and Ridiculousburg.
Flavors are over the top.
A mixture of so many bold flavors that compete with each other, hoping that you'll like at least one of the half dozen profiles.
An embargo should be placed on Flavortown for their over the top ridiculousness of the bold flavors, crazy dia de los muertos meets affliction decor, and outlandish copywriting.
The restaurant comes across as a parody straight out of SNL, but it's real.
The parmageddon wings suffered from breading that was too thick and an overpowering parmesan flavor.
The mac n cheese burger had so many flavors and ingredients that the beef patty was lost.
And, by lost I mean the flavor.
The patty itself was a mess -- weirdly shaped and thin as if a child assembled it then someone ran it over.
No wonder they call it a meat blanket.
The bun was great, but the rest of the burger was just an odd tasting mess.
The order came with a mix of skinny, handcut, and waffle fries, all of which were pretty good.
Expect long waits because of Guy's popularity.
It's Applebee's on steroids.
While it is a kid-friendly restaurant they don't have a kid's menu, meaning that little ones that will eat about five bites will have to order an adult sized item and will likely have plenty of leftovers.

So I definitely checked yelp and everyone is like order the Mac and Cheese burger.
I don't typicality like Mac and Cheese on a burger thanks to the Cheese cake factory, but I went ahead and tried it.
And I gotta say it was pretty good.
Full of flavor and grease and fat - everything you want in a burger.
It would definitely be perfect after a night a drinking and debauchery.
I would eat this burger again.
But the drinks...
Were not that amazing.
Especially for $12 and whatever you do, do not get the cilantro cucumber mess.
Yuck.
Yuck.
Yuck.
Last, and most important is the service.
These waitresses were so nice.
They were personable and helpful and attentive.
I would definitely come back and definitely recommend this place to others.

Great place.
Our server was Nick Cupp, he gave us some killer advice and hooked us up with the appetizers and entrees we wanted.
Would definitely go back

Come hungry!
Leave stuffed!
After dining with them on the Grand Opening, I wanted to bring my husband to taste the magnificent creations of Guy Fieri.
We were greeted and seated immediately.
Awesome.
Within seconds, Nick the Sheriff, was over to introduce himself.
He was incredible and took great care of us during our dining visit.
Thanks Nick!
We started off with the Rojo Rings to split.
So huge!
So tasty!
I love the dipping sauce it comes with.
Has a kick to it that compliments the rings.
We then split the Mac N Cheese Bacon Burger.
Since we told Nick, he had the kitchen already cut it for us.
We also had our own serving of French fries.
Nice!
I love the blend of every style of fry in one bunch on your plate.
As for the burger?
Just as delicious as I remember.
So juicy and full of flavor.
I was glad we split it because I couldn't have finished it myself.
It is a great bar and grill that's full of life in a great location in the strip.
Don't forget to bring your Total Rewards card for the $1 discount on each menu item.
Your stomach will thank you for eating here!

Tried this restaurant out and very happy.
Good was great and service was even better.
We'll be back.

The service was great!
The nachos were amazing!!!
Every chip was loaded and delicious!
The server assistant, Christopher, was very attentive and great personality.
He was awesome!!

I was so excited to visit Guy's new restaurant and my experience far exceeded my expectations.
We had wonderful servers Christopher and Angel.
I was super excited to meet the Chef who was great also!
We had such a great time!
This was by far my favourite spot in Vegas!!!
We will definitely be back, thank you so much!!!!!!

Average food.
Just an expensive tourist spot on the strip.
They should be using prime or grass fed beef for the prices they are charging for their burgers.
I usually would recommend trying a place once so you can make your own decision, but not this place.
Save your money.

We were here the weekend it opened, Easter weekend I believe.
I was expecting more.
The staff was wonderful, but then again they had only been open for a day or two.
The menu is different.
My boyfriend is a steak and potatoes type of guy and there was nothing on the menu he liked.
Since it was lunch I decided to go with something safe, the nachos.
My boyfriend HATED it.
I ate some, but didn't really care for it.
I will admit the burgers looked good.
My only complaint was that EVERYTHING had a "twist to it".
You couldn't just order a regular burger and fries.
I would return with my girlfriends for a girls night out, but I wouldn't take any picky eaters with me.

Go somewhere else.
The food is very over priced and tastes terrible.
The presentation/plating is well done but otherwise is a complete miss.

Terrible!
We were so excited to try this place and all 3 of us were way underwhelmed.
The server was nice and yet it still gets a 1 star.
Had the Greek salad which was so gross, I couldn't stomach it.
When my sister tried it her reaction was the same.
How can you mess up greek salad?
My husband and sister ordered the fish tacos and they were so bland and boring that they both just kinda went, "uh.
" We also tried the pepperoni wrapped pretzels that were super gross and the cheese sauce, while ok, was so salty when combined with the pretzels it was almost inedible.
The fries appetizers were so tiny, thin cut, nasty and looked and tasted so cheap; and yet surprise, they were expensive!!!
After spending $100 for lunch for 3 people (no liquor or desserts) we expected to really like at least one item but we were all very disappointed and didn't really care for any...and this is coming from the least picky eaters ever.
Way better places out there!
Try The Social House if you happen to like Japanese...it's way cheaper (don't let the fancy outside detour you) and all 6 of us were amazed at how good it was!
Another one we tried in Vegas was Goodwich.
Yes, it's a little scary on the outside and it's kind of a hot dog stand type set up that sells sandwiches but WOW, Amazing sandwiches!!!
The 3 of us fell in love!
Do yourself a favor and try anywhere else but here.

Food AWESOME!!!
Service is terrible!
Waitress came to the table one time and then one more to "drop off the check".
Not sure if the reason for such poor service is because they are all unionized.
The get paid.
Too bad for guy...another tarnish on his name.
NY and now Vegas....maybe guy needs to open a restaurant in a right to work state.

I really wanted to Love this place!
Great Rustic fun decor!
friendly hostess and servers.
The(Rojo Rings) onions Rings were Giant and breaded perfectly and just a little spicy..Yummy!
I ordered a Pepsi since the only cold non alcoholic drinks were raspberry Iced tea( Isn't that a little played out by now?
) sodas and Unsweetend tea!I  no Shakes nor Smoothies..a burger Joint without Shakes!1??
sigh!
I could see as the server brought me the Pepsi it was flat..i swished around the drink & still no fizz..i pointed it out to her, she apologized & gave me water.. Hubby really enjoyed his Mac n cheese Burger it was big enough to save half for later.
I had a pulled pork sandwich on a pretzel bun.
It was tasty.
The food was a little pricey but food was tasty...I just wanted over the top goodness from Guy!
oh and either a milkshake or Fizzy Soda!

My wife and I intended to go to a different restaurant at the same hotel, but the wait was too long.
We checked out the menu and thought we'd give it a shot.
I suspect this place catches a lot of overflow, although it was not very busy when we went.
Immediately upon entering you're greeted by a thirty foot Guy Fieri picture whose eyes tend to follow you, no matter where you go.
Occasionally throughout the meal I made awkward eye contact with Guy.
I felt judged.
Seriously, it was a little weird.
Service: three different servers asked us if we wanted drinks, which is better than no servers asking if you want drinks, but a little bothersome.
Water glasses remained full and $12 mimosa and Bloody Mary were ok. Service was attentive overall, but didn't take our app plate when the entrees came, making it a bit crowded at the table.
Food: for an appetizer we had the fondue dippers.
The cheese sauce was decent, but the breadsticks were more difficult to manage than food should be.
Long, dry breadsticks wrapped in pepperoni and dusted with Parmesan cheese.
I don't know if they put them in the oven or what, but they were lukewarm and broke easily.
Kind of messy.
My wife had a Caesar salad and the dressing was not good, way too much cheese, and bland overall.
It came with something called the "mega crouton" which looked like a bread boomerang.
No joke.
She could barely eat any of it.
$17 Caesar salad failure.
I had the mayor of flavor town burger, or something like that.
It had pastrami on the burger with Asian slaw in a pretzel bun.
Came with a fry medley.
This is not the kind of burger you can pick up and eat, which was what I was hoping for.
If you're dressed nice and away from your hotel, handle with extreme caution.
I ended up dismantling it with a fork and knife, but it still wasn't anything special.
The fries were good.
We noticed some other diners having trouble with sandwiches, and I felt a little guilty when I didn't warn the table next to us when they placed their order for burgers.
We found humor in some of the decor and staff uniforms, and had a pretty good time despite the food, but your $95 with tip would be better spent elsewhere.
I debated paying with cash so there would be no record we ever went there.

Delicious wings but felt cheated.
Half of the wings was chopped off for the sake of representation

Decided to check this place out during our week trip to Vegas.
Glad we did!
The food was awesome.
Even our kids liked all the food we tried.
We only had a couple of appetizer, none of the burgers.
We will have to try those next time.
I would of rated 5 stars but our waiter was sort of blah.
He was not bad, we did not have any problems.
He just had no personality, but the rest of the staff was friendly and engaging.
Next time we are in vegas we will be going back.

I wanted to update my review because the manager messaged me on Yelp inviting me back to the restaurant.
I appreciate the fact that they are concerned with their customers feedback.
Hopefully they will use the customer feedback and implement the necessary changes that should be made.
They could start with either lowering their menu prices or purchasing higher quality product.
I don't mind paying top dollar for top quality, but that is not what is offered here.
I am not looking for a free meal.
I just give honest feedback to inform other consumers.
So, I want to be clear about why I gave them two stars on my review.
I would give them five stars if the review was just based on their staff.
The service was excellent.
The staff is very friendly and attentive to the customers, as demonstrated by the manager showing concern about my review.
The kitchen staff did a fine job on the preparation and the presentation of the food.
I was disappointed with the quality of the product used in the perpetration.
The prime rib in the sandwich and the meat in the burgers were not up to par.
The chicken wings were average at best and extremely over priced for what you are served.
Personally, I don't care for some of the flavor combinations on the menu.
I want to be very clear about the fact that the kitchen staff cooked the food properly and presented it as they were supposed to.
It was the quality of the product I gave two stats to, not the service or the preparation.
I think my expectations of the food before I arrived led me to be so disappointed with the food.
It is just average food though.
It was not a bad meal and none of the food tasted bad.
If the prices were not so high, I may have given them three stats.
It is just not worth the money.
The burgers are definitely not up to par with the likes of LBS, Bacchi Burger, and Gordon Ramsay Burger.
I would even say Smash Burger and Fat Burger serves better tasting burgers.
To be fair, I will conclude by suggesting that you give them a try and make your own decision on the quality and taste of the menu items.

The hosting system is terrible.
The table for two we were seated at was available 15 minutes prior to when we were seated.
Also there are 7 other empty tables and a lobby full of people.
Now maybe they aren't asking for first available but we certainly did.
Service so far is so so.
We've had better for much lesser restaurants, but they didn't have a trendy name behind them they simply had to stand on their grub and advice alone.
We both ordered a taco dish.
Prices seem goldilocks not too cheap and not too high.
The tacos were okay, as mentioned in other reviews it's a little subpar but that's what I have come to expect in LV.
But keeping water flowing in my glass shouldn't be that difficult.
Now the Border Grill was a bit higher in price but oh my gosh it was so good.
It was different but top notch... To me the quality exceeded the price.
I'm glad we tried it, just wish it was worth 5 stars.

Guy Fieri isn't exactly the most refined of the Food Network lineup of stars, but you would at least expect something decent if it has the dude's name attached to it.
I mean, I have yet to be disappointed by any of the restaurants featured on Diners, Drive-ins, & Dives that I've visited.
Well, so much for his namesake restaurant.
Prices are in line with similar Vegas restaurants.
That said, for the amount of money you're dropping, and the fact that the place carries a food celebrity endorsement, you'd expect a lot better quality food.
Had the bacon mac & cheese burger, and it's a fantastic burger in theory.
Execution, however, left a crap-ton to be desired.
The burger was dry (not moist & juicy) and clearly flat-top fried and not grilled.
Then they serve it to you on this narrow wooden plank, which certainly looked cool.
But when it's a big, messy, burger, the serving plate was utterly useless.
The fried goodies it came with were also served in an odd manner -- wrapped in wax paper and suspended from an aluminum-wire thing.
Super messy -- all form, no function.
Portions were, no surprise, massive.
But when you consider the food was mediocre, it was just a plate full of blah.
Ignore the Guy Fieri hype.
No need to bother with this place.

The food is great, the prices are a couple more dollars expensive than they should be, and the service at the bar is below par for Strip restaurants.
Will I go back?
Maybe, but definitely won't go out of my way.
There are a couple of gut-bomb burgers that I'd like to try because the nachos we had were pretty solid, but I will prepare myself for the inattentive service.
I actually expected better from something with Guy Fieri's name attached to it.
One interesting thing about the beer prices, is that they are generally $7 for a pint, but they had 2 different Sam Adams that were the cheapest beer on the menu for $6 each.
Thank you for missing that one Guy Fieri pricing guy!

In Vegas there are to many choices but this was a great choice.
I can't wait to go back.
We tried three different burgers and for dessert we had to try the cheese cake.
You better be hungry.
Looks like he borrowed a few recipes from the Television Series Diners, Drive-Ins and Dives.
Give it a try.

YES!!!
Welcome to Flavortown!
If you are a ultra picky foodie this might not be the place for you.
However if you like real good food with even better service this is the place for you to go!
For an App our family of four had the nachos to share.
Really tasty.
The cheese and topping to chip ratio is better than any other restaurant I have been to.
The flavors are spot on.
Just enough spice to make it all really tasty.
Mains were the street tacos (you got five small tacos with two dipping sauces), and the mac and cheese burger.
The street tacos were really good and almost overstuffed the small tortillas.
The burger was very good.
Too bad I didn't see the mac and cheese as a dish or side.
I would have ordered it.
Fries are also fantastic.
Just enough of a spice to make them a little different.
Warning the burger is messy.
You will get the napkin dirty.
Service was also really good, place has great food.
Hopefully he branches this concept out to more than Vegas.
I will be back!

Soooo AMAZING!
Our party of three shared the Mac n cheese bacon burger and Picnic turkey sandwich.
They were both full of flavor, unique, and so delicious.
Our waiter, Adrian C, was as awesome as the food.
Loved him!
We went at 2:00 pm on a Friday afternoon and had just a short wait and once we ordered the food came out fast.
My only complaint would be the snobby hostesses.
Will definitely come again next time I'm in Vegas!

Went here shortly after it opened and was not disappointed.
Despite being busy we only waited about fifteen minutes to be seated.
While we were being shown to our seats everyone working the bar gave us a big hello and warm welcome as we walked by which was cool.
Awesome staff and fantastic food.
We had Italian fondue dippers and Rojo rings for apps and they were both awesome!
Next up was the Triple B Burger and the Big Dipper sandwich...wow!
What an awesome place and not as expensive as you would think for a celebrity restaurant.
Will definitely go back on out next night out on the strip!

Let me start by saying the service was great (besides the hostess who told us that she had texted us awhile ago and we had not gotten a text).
Thomas L. was our server he and his help did a wonderful job serving and entertaining at the same time:).
The actual food was another story.
Another reviewer said it perfectly "it's Applebee's on steroids".
Presentation is fun but not much flavor.
I was really disappointed Guy!

I had Guys burger on a cruise ship this past year and loved the taste.
I was happy to see the same exact burger offered on the menu and was excited to be able to have a burger closer to home than having to pay to go on a cruise.
I notified my husband to brag about the burger because he would eat an average of 2 everyday on the ship.
The burger had exactly the same condiments but it didn't taste the same.
Off The Hook Original Smashburger  I had here in Vegas had more bread, lettuce, bigger onion ring, but not enough sauce.
I was disappointed with the taste and goes to show bigger isn't always better.
I did enjoy the truffle fries on the menu.

The trendiness and atmosphere of this place will probably draw you in, but overall it just gets three stars from me.
Plenty of presentation points, and the food was fairly good, but from a value standpoint, it falls short a bit.
It's worth trying, however.

Let me start with the good.
The waitstaff was awesome.
Very nice.
And helpful as this was my first time at the restaurant.
Also were helpful when my son got sick at the table from eating the Fresno Chile that came with his bbq wings.
Also they removed the pepperoni breadsticks from my bill when it was obvious they were not a hit with the table.
Here is the bad: my son said the Wings tasted funny.
So I made the mistake of eating them.
I didn't pay attention to whether the meat was fully cooked.
But the meat must not have been, because within one hour of leaving I became violently ill.
I am on my third day of suffering the effects of the food poisoning.
Ruined the last 2 days of my trip to Vegas.
My friend's son got the runs from eating the hamburger.
And my friend is still sick as well from the grease.
We are pretty sure the issue was  uncooked chicken and old grease.
We will not return to the restaurant.
Which is sad because we only went to the restaurant because my son loves Guy Fieri.

I really had no expectations for this place but they really proved me wrong.
The service here is crazy good.
Nick was knowledgeable and fun.
The burgers are huge, enough that we split one.
Even though they were huge, you can taste the quality of the burger.

The place is nice and the customer service is pretty good.
I expected a lot more from the food.
I got an original stash  burger.
The buns taste just like store bought buns and they get soggy with everything they put in them.
The beef patty was dry and had no flavor.
I ended up leaving most of the soggy buns and eating everything else.
The fries are pretty good though.
I expected a lot more, especially from a $15+ burguer.
Ever heard of GBurger down on socal?
Now those are good burgers and for $15 you get a huge one that tastes 10+ times better

Triple T fries are to die for!
Lots of great other apps too!
Great service from Nick Cupp and Kevin.
Plus we got to meet someone famous.
Can't wait to come again!

I really wanted to like this place, but sadly it was a let down.
The service was ok - mostly friendly staff (there are tons of them in very uncomfortable-looking uniforms), our food came out promptly... Maybe a little too promptly.
Presentation was great, but it highly lacked in flavor.
My fish tacos were bland - no spice factor at all - and when I asked for some hot sauce my choices were Sriracha or Tabasco.
Uh... What the hell?
Come on Guy, you can do better than that.
My buddy ordered chicken wings that were supposed to be "so hot they should be illegal", but they were not.
Bottom line: it's factory food for the masses with little to no finesse where it counts, which I suppose is perfect for that tourist trap area of Vegas.
Guess I should have seen that coming.

The Quad is on an upgoing trend when it comes to hotel standard and restaurants within it.
Guy fieris restaurant isnt an exception.
With a fun and unique menu combined with great service all adds up to a good experience.
Portions are presented in cool way, size leaves most of us pleased and flavors are twisted in a new way.
It can be a line so be there early or get ready for some waiting!

Went here for lunch on a weekday.
Saw the menu online and it looked tasty.
The hostess and server were great!
I ordered The Big Dipper and the wife ordered a caesar salad.
She loved her salad, and I didn't love my Big Dipper.
The dish itself was good.
I love that for fries you get every imaginable fry possible.
Regular fries, waffle fries, pub fries, you name it, you get it.
That was a nice touch.
The crispy onions were great on top of the sandwich, the horseradish was "on point" but man, I gotta tell ya, the prime rib was just too fatty.
Listen, I know that fat = flavor so you have to leave some of that in there to make a good tasting sandwich.
And I wanted so bad to eat all of it because the flavor was great.
It was just too fatty; it felt like I was eating more fat than meat.
And I get pricing on the Strip is going to be higher than normal, but even if that sandwich was perfect, it wouldn't have been a $20 sandwich.
I would go there again, but try something much different.

When you come here (not if) you must request Chris Anderson.
He was fun, charismatic, and informative!
He was very knowledgeable on all the different dishes and expressed his own opinion.
It was an enjoyable experience all around!
Service was incredible!
However...the crushed wasabi pea sauce for the wings was heavy on parmesan and the pickles for the burgers/sandwiches were sweeter than I expected.
Oh and if you decide to do the 16 4-oz beer tour, check ti make sure they have your t-shirt size in stock...if yhey don't they eill exchange the size they give you for the size you want when you come back!
Bottom line: dishes were sweeter than expected,  but the service was sweeter!

Possible one of the top places to eat on the strip.
Friendly staff and awesome bartenders.
The food is amazing, Guy out did himself once again.

We are big Guy and DDD fans.....this did not disappoint.
Staff was fun and very attentive.
They knew the menu well and offered suggestions.
The "challenges" were not advertised....had to over here of them.
The reward card is nice as well.
We had the flavor town burger......wow great flavors, pastrami, cole slaw, onion strings, burger just the right amount of sauce.
All look and are enough to split.....we recommend and will be back!

I had very high expectations for Guy Fieri's restaurant at the Quad.!
Unfortunately, I left feeling underwhelmed.
Customer service was very good.
Upon arrival, my group and I were immediately greeted by a group of hostesses.
There had to be at least four of them standing there.
They were nice but also very nonchalant.
Maybe that's because it wasn't really busy on a Wednesday night and they all really didn't have anything to do.
One escorted us to our table and we were almost immediately given water.
About ten minutes after getting the water, our server approached us and gave us the menus.
He also asked if we had any questions about anything on the menu or about the restaurant.
He was very polite, informative, and attentive.
I ordered the '67 Cajun Sandwich and my friends ordered the Big Dipper Sandwich to share.
I also ordered the "Lemon Drop..Not" cocktail and the S'mores Monte Cristo dessert.
The '67 Cajun Sandwich was just alright.
I expected the bread to be soft, but I believe it was sourdough so it was a little harder than I prefer.
The meats were seasoned well and the hot sauce added a nice tangy kick to the sandwich.
I really liked the fact that they serve different types of fries: crinkle, waffle, and string.
With that being said, the fries were not hot and tasted like they had been sitting in a warmer waiting to be served.
When served fresh, McDonald's fries are better than these were.!
Yes, I said it.!!
The Lemon Drop Cocktail was sweet, lemony, and delicious.
The S'mores dessert was very tasty and served with strawberry and chocolate syrups, although, I would've liked for it to be served warmer.
My friends enjoyed there Big Dipper sandwich with Au Jus sauce and left happy.
(Partially because they didn't have to pay for dessert..Lol.
)   So service was good and the food for me was just okay.
It definitely was not the best "American Diner" I've been to.
I'll have to go back and try some other things on the menu and maybe update my rating, but for now 3 stars is all it's getting from me.

High five and fist bump your waiter, then never see them again... Service is not good here, sorry Guy.
To the table we carried our nearly empty drinks and no drink orders were ever taken or offered throughout the entire meal.
I had to flag down a bus boy to get a glass of water.
The burger was pretty good, but nothing special, maybe since it took an hour to arrive, it didn't taste as good as it should have.
I don't think the waiter ever put the order in until we asked about our food a half hour after the order was taken.
At one point the waiter came by and apologized for his behavior and he gave us a sob story about being seated too many tables, boohoo.
No compensation was given to us.
The manager was walking around but never came by our section to ask anyone how are they were doing.
Maybe stop here at the bar for a drink, the bar is ok, but don't wait for a table here it's just not worth it, you may waste a large part of your night waiting and wondering.
There are too many other places that appreciate your business on the Vegas Strip, take your business elsewhere, sorry Mr.
Fieri....Stick to the TV show and Camaro driving or fix your staff starting with the management down to the hosts.

We're Las Vegas locals and have eaten at many "celebrity chef" restaurants on the Strip.
In my opinion, the bigger the TV "star", the worse the restaurant.
In that sense, Guy Fieri's did not disappoint.
We went about 5:30 p.m. on a Thursday and it wasn't too crowded.
Unfortunately, half of the indoor seating was in direct blinding sunlight.
As in you had to wear sunglasses during the dinner to not be blinded.
And sadly, many patrons did wear them.
Seriously?
Not acceptable.
Then our waitress (I don't think she ever told us her name, which is lucky for her so I can't call her out) disappeared and barely to our order and had to be asked several times to refill our waters.
She never even came back to take our cocktail order after I told her I needed a few extra minutes to order.
Oddly, she was extremely attentive to the table next to us.
Even then, our glasses sat empty forever.
The food was salty, over sized portions and over priced.
$19 for a pulled pork sandwich.
That's high even by the Strip prices.
Did I mention it was SALTY?
Thus the constant need for our water refills.
Even though the Mexican Churros that the table next to us ordered for dessert "looked" delicious, we had had enough and opted out of spending any more time or money there.

Fish, steak and chicken tacos were good but the chili was a little too spicy.
Cleavage, not prompt service, is the strong suit here.
We ordered  4 flights of beer, only two of which came while will still had food on the table.
Had to ask a few times to get our other two flights.
Tshirt that came free with the beer was not 100% cotton but at least the design was good.
High noise level.
Don't try and negotiate a contract here!

I've been fortunate enough to dine here three times since it's opening.
Guy Fieri's Vegas Kitchen is located inside The Quad Hotel & Casino.
If you're familiar with Guy Fieri on TV and his personality.
You will see it echoed prominently in the look & design of his restaurant.
Even the attitude & energetic atmosphere exuded by the employees represent Guy Fieri's style.
Of course, if you find Guy Fieri's persona & shows unappealing, this would not be the place for you.
I've tried the Tatted-up Turkey burger, '67 Cajun chicken sandwich & mac & cheese bacon burger entrees.
All were awesome, full of flavor.
Each comes with a fry mix & the burgers are massive.
The mac & cheese was quite rich.
Some might find it too much so, but heck, theres mac & cheese in there, what do you expect right?
The '67 surprised me in that the blackened chicken was super tender & cooked perfectly.
And a tasty turkey burger is always a good thing.
Their appetizers were all very yummy too.
My favorites are the Rojo Rings, onion rings that come hanging on a pipe accompanied by a sriracha ketchup.
The Guy-talian fondue dippers, giant breadstickers wrapped in pepperoni with a sausage & provolone cheese dip.
I was even dipping my fries in the cheesy dip 'cause I loved it so much.
Waiters & servers were very attentive & lively.
I was also fortunate enough to meet Mike, the manager of the establishment.
I would be willing to go out of my way to The Quad just to come to Guy Fieri's.
I do find it interesting that one of the low end hotel casinos on the strip is home to two great food spots.
Hash House and here.
Definitely earns a 5 star rating in my book!

Had a quick bite to eat here last night and the food was good but it wasn't fantastic.
The service however was not good at all.
Our server was Shelby and she was not attentive in any way.
She did not ask if we have any questions about the menu nor did she offer to tell us her recommendations.
We ordered 2 items from the menu and 2 beers.
I had the summer ale and the hubs had a lager.
She brought the beers out and mistakenly gave me my husband's.
I didn't know and I took a couple of sips before my husband realized it.
We ordered the whiskey spicy wings and the drunkun fish tacos, both were good but the wings were not spicy.
The server brought the food out, laid them on the table and disappeared.
It would be nice of her to offer a couple of plates...  we had to ask for it when she reappeared which was a while later.
Towards the end of the meal, she did ask us once how the food was but as soon as she asked the question, she looked away to check on the next table, never looking back at us for our response.
Finally what I found to be the most rude is that she never thanked us for coming.
She handed me the bill without saying anything!!!
And the same thing when she handed me back my credit card and the slip.
I will come back to eat here but definitely hope another server would be taking care of me.

Great food but not for kids.
I know, I know, who takes their kids to Vegas.
I drove out to Vegas from California for a high school graduation.
Anyways, waitress was great, food was awesome.
Atmosphere is nice.
Freakin awesome cloth napkins and cutlery.
A kids menu would be nice.
Sorry, it was a family trip.

I wanted to really like this place because the food looks amazing but it was just okay.
The portions are also enormous and I normally wouldn't mind but I feel bad for wasting when the food just isn't that great!
First off, the atmosphere is really fun and lively and our waiter was friendly.
We came as a party of 5 and we had no wait going at 11pm on a Sunday.
Our drinks were kept full and our food arrived in a timely manner.
Fondue dippers $13- pretty good flavor and their cheese sauce had a nice tang to it.
Mac + Cheese Bacon Burger $17- pretty dry and over cooked :( also nothing really popped in flavor, it was kind of under-seasoned.
For how tall the whole burger was, the beef was probably only 1/4 an inch thick at most.
I picked at the Mac & Cheese and that by itself was pretty bland.
One thing I really liked was that your $17 Burger comes with fries, you don't have to order it a la carte like most Burger places on the strip.
However, the fries were pretty stale and too crunchy, but wayy too seasoning!
Also, the serving board it comes on is ridiculous.
It looks really nice but it's way too small, three of us that got burgers asked for extra plates otherwise it would end up on our laps.
Off Da' Hook Burger $16- I didn't try this one but boyfriend basically said the same thing I said about the Mac & Cheese Burger.
Lava Rock Shrimp Tacos $17- I didn't try these as well but my friend said she really liked them even though she took all the toppings off lol.
S'mores Monte Cristo $10- this thing was rock hard!!!!
I had to use my burger knife to cut through it and I could barely taste the chocolate and marshmallow :( way overfried.
The raspberry dipping sauce it came with was really good so it saved it from being a complete fail.
Cheesecake Challenge $12- another huge portion of eh.
Cheesecake tasted like something I could buy at Smiths or Albertsons.
Impressive looking but not impressive in flavor.
Maybe it was an off night of everything being overcooked but overall, another case of where food looks way better than it tastes.
$175 worth of mediocre food.
The price isn't the issue since the portions are huge and comparable to other burger joints on the strip but the quality of flavor just wasn't there.
I still think Gordon Ramsey's BurGR and Holsteins are my favorite.
I would even prefer Bachi Burger.
My boyfriend and I didn't care for it, maybe we are spoiled here in Vegas?
But the other three that were visiting from Solvang, CA really loved it.
So idk...try it for yourself I guess!

What a great surprise!
We live in Vegas and normally don't go to the strip to eat.
But this place does it right!
Started with the nachos.
Seriously delicious.
And they pride themselves with zero "naked nachos".
They hit the mark.
Had the pulled pork and rock shrimp street tacos for our main meal.
Great tasting.
Large portions.
And to top it off, the fries that cd with the pulled pork are mixed!
So you get waffle fries, steak fries, and skinny fries all together!
Bonus!
Customer service was great.
Prices were extremely reasonable (especially for a strip restaurant).
Highly recommend making this a go-to place for any meal while you're in Vegas!

It was OK.
I got the mac n cheese bacon burger which was super messy and hard to eat!
I knife and fork'ed it :p I liked the outer well-done edges of the patty (I like well-done burgers) and any bite with bacon.
The rest was "eh.
" It came with fries that tasted like barbecue chips - and I'm not much of a barbecue chips kind of person :/ My dining companion ordered their rock shrimp tacos which she finished.
Either she was very hungry or she really liked them :p The portion wasn't huge though.
We got there sometime after 11am and it wasn't too busy, but it started to fill up soon after.
We sat outside where it was sort of shady, sort of not, depending on where you sat.
We had the outermost seating which got a little bit of sun so it felt quite hot at times in that 100 degree heat!
Plus it was a bit smoky as it's so close to the Quad's open-air casino entrance.
Oh, and tables were packed kind of close together.
But I love outdoor seating on the Strip so I dealt with it all :)  Service was pretty good.
We received proper greetings upon entrance and exit, and we never had to wait too long for anything.
A manager even came by to see how things were going, and we were given a survey to fill out at the end of our meal.
So clearly they are aiming to please their customers, which is good.
Overall, food was just ok and service above average.
Three stars for you, Guy Fieri.

I have been wanting to try this place out for awhile.
So went here with a few friends.
I ordered the sashimi tacos.
Its basically 4 mini tacos from the appetizers.
They were good but just needed a little bit more flavor.
I thought if they added 1 more taco then it would be worth spending $14 for it.
The sashimi was fresh and the shells are a soft crisp.
They broke apart pretty easily.
Also tried the chicken wraps.
Its only enough for 3 people.
They give you only 3 pieces of lettuce and assorted chicken.
Its ground chicken, skewered chicken and chicken egg rolls.
My friends had a regular burger and and a turkey burger.
Both dishes came with 3 or 4 assorted fries.
It had good sized portions.
For a drink, I got the Java Guava.
Really good.
It had a little spice to it.
It came with a jalapeno on the side.
Dessert, we ordered a simple mint chocolate chip ice cream with oreos.
Nothing too special.
It was just drizzled in fudge and oreos.
Also a good portion.
Its enough for 3-4 people.
Overall, its an ok place.
The location of the restaurant is facing the street.
It also has outdoor seating.
So people watching can be interesting.

I was lucky enough to be one of the first to eat here on their Grand Opening so I returned with my wife to try out some other items.
We waited for a server for about 15-20 mins just to get a drink  order placed.
The rest of the dinning experience our server was on point and very helpful and friendly.
The food itself was just blah to me.
I feel I was duped on opening night with flavorful food to make the tv personality look like a hero of sort.
The off Da Hook burger.
Loaded with lettuce and a giant onion ring pickles and a burger patty that was hard to locate.
It brought back memories of a commercial saying " where's the beef??
" Gen Tso's wings- the presentation was on point but the wings were not.
Soaking in the sauce they lacked any kind of crispness.
Rojo Rings- oversized onion rings with some good flavors.
This was the only part of the meal that didn't disappoint.
Too many other options to in LV to give this place another shot.
I hate to spend money on disappointing food.

I had the six cheese Mac and bacon burger and it was delicious.
The fries were a nice touch as well.
The service was quick despite the number of people and the waitress was courteous and helpful.
The ambiance is unique and we were able to eat on the patio which is pretty much right on the strip.
I will definitely go back

Fancy burgers but when it comes down to it, $100 for 4 people to have a burger isn't quite worth it!

I had the Mac n Cheese burger, it was pretty much delicious!
Not much else to say apart from the taste profile was just about perfect!
Downside?
Absolutely difficult to eat given how mahousive it was!
Also...
It was huge.
I chopped it in half.
My friend had the fish tacos which were described as 'mediocre'....   Service was far from adequate, we sat outside and our waters were not topped up fast enough, it was roasting!
Finally...
The manager wandered randomly to the table and asked how the meal was, here's the thing, he didn't identify himself and wasnt wearing anything remotely identifying him as an employee or a manager ... Creepy.

Loved this restaurant :) amaze balls.
Wow everything was on point I'm really happy I came here.
Customer service 10, restaurant 10, food 10.
If your thinking about going here get of the phone and get your behind there now !!!
We started of with a cocktail the famous guava drink it was bomb!
Then we got some wings the ones with the whiskey and if your worried if there going to taste like alcohol not at all they were delicious, after that we tried the mac and cheese burgers wow they were great I just didn't know how to start eating it and the FRIES wow the best fries ever they have different types of fries mixed like waffle fries, the regular stick looking ones and crisscut fries they had some seasoning that reminded me of the BBQ ruffles for some apparent reason .
Sorry this review is so long but I just want to show u how amazing everything was :)

I tried this place on Saturday for the first time!
The service was great.
Fast drinks and food orders.
The food itself was really good.
I had the mayor of flavortown burget which was really fantastic.
The desserts are a bit on the insane side in terms of size / quantity.
When I was there for lunch the place was packed, buzzing and had a good Vegas feel !
If you're on the strip - I suggest you drop in and try it out !

Amazing!
Amazing!
I had the Mac and cheeseburger!
One of the best burgers I have ever had.
We also ordered the onion rings and fondue dippers and those we're very good also!
Waitress had the best sense of humor and our drinks we're being refilled constantly .
Can't wait to go back here!

You are definitely paying for the name, to a certain extent.
The food is good, and certainly unique.
Pepperoni-wrapped breadsticks were quite tasty.
Burgers were good, but a bit overcooked.
Nice to have four-five types of potatoes on the side, but the way they are served makes a mess.
Make sure to join and give your casino player's card to save a buck or two.

I had the Mac and cheese burger, and my girlfriend had the turkey burger.
She described it as the "best turkey burger she has ever had".
My burger was really good as well.
The fries that came with it were pretty cool...
They gave you an assortment of types (waffle, shoestring, curly, etc).
It was a lot of food... We also had the s'mores monte cristo .
Not my favorite dessert...
The description didn't say that it was deep fried (like a doughnut) but it was.
We didn't finish it.
The restaurant itself was really pretty cool...
But I think most of the restaurants I Vegas are...
They certainly charge enough.
We had 2 specialty cocktails at the bar while we waited for our table (that we're really good and the bartender as really cool)  that cost us $24 plus tip and then our burgers,  1 more rail drink and a dessert for a little more then $60.
Overall, I would recommend this restaurant if you want a really good burger while your on the strip

Mac n cheese burger and the onion rings were huge and delicious.
Our waitress was awesome too.

Guy-ism: We'd be hitting up the Linq like some Kulinary Gangstas and we had to stop in to try my brah Fieri's new place.
English Translation: The Linq was flooded, half the stores shut down, so under coercion of my non-foodie bf, who for some reason has a man-crush on Guy, we tried Fieri's new place.
Guy-ism: Yo brah, I love yo' show and that, but it's some seriously messed up grub you servin' up there.
Translation: The food stinks, waaaay overpriced, filled with tourists and every cheesy wannabe-cool, wannabe-foodie, marketing slogan is used here.
Guy-ism: Yo, I've never been more excited about Drunken Fish Tacos since my frat days, but man, these blow.
Damn, talk about a buzz kill, it's like finding out Amanda, the hot, redhead chick has the clap or somethin'.
It may be slam-drunk, but damn if I'm doing any slamming.
Translation: For $18 you get ammonium-smelling TILAPIA.
Yeah, ok Guy... for $18, at least serve some seared ahi.
The radish or ginger on top is gross.
The tacos tastes plain, maybe they forgot the mojo de ajo???
Guy-ism: This place is money.
Yeah, like it's going to cost you a lot of money!
Dude, I know we be all gangster and thug and sh*t but 70 dead presidents for lunch is not cool.
Translation: Fish Tacos, overly greasy Philly Dip Sandwich, one cocktail is the same price as a NY Steak dinner off-Strip.
Yeah... screw you Guy and your man-crushes.

On our first visit here, the week it opened, the hostess have us a quick mini tour as she was taking us to our table.
On our next visit, we didn't get that.
The first time, we sat outside, which was actually pretty nice.
It's rather loud, but the people watching is awesome and you can hear / somewhat see the bands playing at Carnival Court.
On our second visit, we sat inside at a high top.
Avoid this at all costs.
The high-tops are way way WAY too close together and super awkward.
Our sever even apologized for how awkward it was.
The ambiance and space are cool.
Has a definite Guy feel to it.
It reminds me of a nicer and newer Tex Wasabi's (Sonoma Valley location).
I was super SUPER excited to come here because of one thing: Vegas fries!
As you might notice on my profile here on Yelp, Vegas fries would be my last meal.
The Vegas fries at Tex Wasabi's are just a total dream.
But alas, they are all different here.
At Wasabi's, they are thin fries, covered and drenched in hot sauce and Parmesan crumbs.
Drenched, but still crispy.
Here, they're giant twisty fries.
And you get a shot of hot sauce to pour over them.
Hint: Right away when you order them, order extra hot sauce and extra blue wasabi sauce.
The blue wasabi dipping sauce is insanely delicious.
I could eat it by itself with a spoon.
Seriously.
God bless Guy Fieri for coming up with this.
So while the Vegas fries aren't the same, they're still tasty.
And the portion is huge.
4 stars.
So on to the wings.
Have I mentioned how much I love hot wings?
The Fireball whiskey wings have a fantastic flavor and are served with the divine blue wasabi sauce.
4 stars.
The Parmaggedon wings are mostly breading and were too dry and overdone.
They're served with a marinara dipping sauce which was tasty.
2 stars.
The wings themselves are kinda fatty and don't seem like the best quality.
If they were better quality, they'd be more stars.
Be wary of the beer flight deal.
We were told it was $11.
But that's actually $11 per each series of 4 beers.
We were quite shocked when we received our bill.
But after asking the waitress, she knocked the price back to what we thought it was.
The full tasting is 4 series of 4 beers.
And if you drink them all, you get a t-shirt.
James O. and I were sharing, so our server was really nice and let us each have a t-shirt.
Very cool.
Fair warning: The beers are mostly IPAs, and you should share as, well, that's a lot of f-ing beer.
The frozen shots sounded intriguing to me, so I ordered the Fireball whiskey one.
It was not frozen.
It was totally room temp in a cold shot glass.
Not at all what I was imagining.
The fried sundae was so fabulous.
Huge!
Get it!
It comes with a ton of toppings and you basically create your own fried ice cream sundae.
We had a blast with this.
5 stars.
On both visits, the servers were nice, friendly, knowledgeable of the menu, and attentive.
All in all, I'll keep coming back.
But I wonder if I can get the Vegas fries Tex Wasabi-style?
They are quite better that way.

We had the pleasure of eating here twice in the same day.
Guy is the bomb, so we figured his joint would be, as well.
The restaraunt is very nice and the open kitchen rocks.
The wait staff was fun and attentative.
All of the decor, uniforms, menu and experience  totalled up to be very Guyish.
Dug it.
Our meals, however, were a bit up and down.
I'll describe each meal and dish seperately.
LUNCH:   2 people - 0 wait time  App:  Ultimate Chicken wrap - this was very good.
Consisted of a few small egg rolls, a few chicken skewers, and lettuce wraps with three sauces (spicy sweet/sour, soy, satay).
This was a great start to the meal.
Meal:  Tatted-Up Turkey Burger.
It is big and awesome.
Great flavor.
This comes with a medley of fries with a very good seasoning.
I, now, have a mission to find ancho bacon.
IMPRESSION: This was a great experience.
My wife and I loved our meal.
DINNER:   5 people - 20 minute wait time  App:  Rojo Rings:   Both of these were brought out quickly.
The onion rings were good and crispy.
They had good seasoning on the batter and the sauce was great.
Nachos Del Jefe: The Nachos (holy batman!
) were killer.
These little chips are a sublime mix of mild chorizo and cheese that bring flavortown down to it's knees praying.
They are that good.
Meal:  Mac-N-Cheese Bacon Burger: Friend had this and loved it.
Victors Street Tacos: very average and small.
the tortilla's weren't really prepped at all.
Friend stated that this was bland and needed more salsa.
The Motley Que Sandwich: This was were the rails came off.
This sandwich is an exact replica of the Deli Cowboy from Jason's Deli.
It is a very saucy pulled pork.
All you can taste is a BBQ that I would expect any Joe Blow to be able to prep in their crock pot.
To make matters worse, the waitress stated that this sandwich was the absolute best thing on the menu.
I don't think the chick from Vegas knows what real BBQ should be.
When you have tp pay $20 bucks for it, it just makes you disappointed.
Dessert:   S'mores Monte Cristo: This was ok.
It looks cool, but it came accross too greasy.
it is really big and all in all, too much grease and sweetness to eat all of it.... even for 5 of us sharing one dessert.
I would have marked this a 5 after lunch... but, a few pieces of the dinner made this a big dip.
That Pulled Pork sandwich should really, really be re-considered.

"Expensive, but, it IS on the Strip"  One of the first questions I asked our server was, "Why are the prices SO high?
" She said right off because they're on the strip - although you need to walk around the place into the Quad to find the entrance.
As for prices, for their selections, especially the burgers, I have seen lower prices at various hotels along the Strip in Las Vegas.
The burgers: With so many options for burgers along the Strip, I have become very picky about the taste of the MEAT in the burger, rather than just all the fancy toppings that places have been putting on their burgers to entice one to order.
Three of us ordered three different burgers, and surprisingly, the meat on all three tasted different, and not from the toppings.
We actually talked extensively about the different tastes of the meat alone, not the burger as a whole.
So, while the burgers are overpriced, they were good.
Many of my Las Vegas meat experiences have been that the meat is okay, just no special flavors in the meat itself.
The burgers taste came mostly from the toppings.
The fries were fries, although their standard fries that come with the burger are a mix of three - waffle, curly, and regular.
Drinks - both non-alcoholic as well as the alcoholic - are very pricey.
Service was good.
Overall it was a "standard" Las Vegas establishment: pricey and themed.
Although, I must say we were impressed with the quality and taste of the burger meat.
(Which is why they got star #4.
) However, I probably won't go back without a BOGO.

1st visit and the waiter recommended the Big Dipper.
I was satisfied.
Didn't care for the assorted fries.
Too crunchy/over fried for my taste.
Prices are high due to it's location, but I would go back and try something else.

In Vegas for my husband's birthday weekend and saw Guy's new restaurant.
We decided to stop in for lunch since we are fans.
The place was clean and the service was great.
The fondue dippers were too die for!
I have to go again just to get them.
The victor chicken street tacos were good but average.
They weren't special in any way.
I can't wait to go back on our next trip.

Great time...good friends...great food... Liz was a great with us and helping in making great food decisions

This place is fantastic.
Pretty good craft beer selection on draft.
We started with The Generals Wings which were prepared like lollipops and covered in a sweet & spicy General TSO's sauce.
They were out of this world.
I then ordered the Triple B Burger which was a blue cheese burger with smoky bacon strips.
It was excellent.
It was accompanied by very good fries.

One shot, everything rides on tonight Even if I've got three strikes, Imma go for it, This moment, we own it And I'm not to be played with at...GUY FIERI!
- 2 Chainz (we own it)  These burgers are serious business my friends.
They forgot to mention that each burger comes with extra napkins!
On the menu there's salads, sandwiches, and burgers but for the Guy Fieri experience, I think you gotta go with a signature burger.
As a plus, each burger comes with a fries sampler with 4 different types of cuts so you don't have to order fries on the side.
Don't expect much from the fries though, just average.
We shared the Mac n Cheese burger and asked them to cut it in half for us since I knew it was going to be monstrous.
We also got the rojo rings (HUGE onion rings) and it came with this surprisingly great sriracha/ketchup dipping sauce.
We even used it for the fries that came with the burger.
It was messy to eat but so tasty, and I'm not even a fan of mac n cheese.
Btw I think the menu said it won some sort of nyc burger competition in 2013 so there you go!
P.S.
there's no cooling system if you choose to sit outside so keep that in mind for the summer time

Went during 25th birthday weekend in Vegas.
Heard good reviews and decided to give the place a try on my walk down the strip.
Bf got carne asada street tacos and I got chicken.
Four tacos to a plate were about $16.
It is the strip so I'm not surprised.
The tacos were realllyyyy good especially with the sauces provided.
I liked the chicken more than I did the carne.
Will definitely be back to try one of those huge burgers that passed me by!

I think the 4 star average review this place has is spot on.
I enjoy Fieri's (nee: Ferry) show "Diner's Drive-ins, and Dives" on the Food Network very much.
Guy himself seems like kind of a d-bag but the places he visits are very interesting.
Being a d-bag from northern California, I suspect his own cuisine for his restaurants is firmly in the Flingers (google Office Space) category: over-engineered snack food for fat/lazy/stupid people.
Now, if you know this going in, it's not half bad.
The waitresses are done up in a denim skirt/dress thing and the waiters are in a similiar denim outfit.
OK I guess, but I prefer waitstaff to not be subject to a fixed  dress code unless I am at Hooters.
I got the drunken fish tacos and the truffle fries.
I could not finish the truffle fries, the bowl was huge.
The tacos were actually not bad, I could eat that regularly.
The fries weren't bad either, but I was on a business trip and eating alone.
To share, they would be perfect.
To sum up, there's really nothing wrong with this place, assuming you are OK with average middle-America mall type food.
This will amaze you.
It's a little hard to get to (unless you are staying at the Quad); you have to negotiate your way to the Self-Parking (or take the tram) and then find your way back to the car afterwards.
I know it sounds like I'm dumping all over the place, but I did like it.
I would even go back and try something else out.
I bet it would be a blast with friends (kinda like a sports bar).
But haute cuisine it's not.
Expect something better than your average TGI-Fridays and you'll have a good time.
Another plus is that it is open late (2AM) which kept it on my "list of places to try when I've been out all night and everything else is closed".

Guy's is located to the newly renovated Quad hotel near the pathway leading to Harrah's.
They have an option for indoor seating which features awesome brown cow print bar stools or covered outdoor seating allowing for people watching and music courtesy of Carnival's DJ.
We chose the later, it was a relatively cooler day (in Vegas terms) so outdoor seating was obvious.
I chose the Greek salad with the barbecue chicken wings as an appetizer.
Our waiter was nice enough and took our orders quickly and got us our drinks.
Side note, our waters had some of the largest ice cubes (actual cubes) that I had ever seen in my life - I was amazed.
I was also pleasantly surprised by the speediness in which our food came out.
The chicken drumsticks were ingenious, each drumstick was trimmed down leaving the meat at the bottom of the bone almost creating a handle making it super easy to bite down without the mess.
The plate was accompanied by a delicious sauce that I can only guess was a creamy ranch and a bowlful of fresh veggies.
My Greek salad was a complete work of art in multiple layers, so pretty but in the end a little hard to eat.
The base layer of my salad featured hummus and then built upon that were romain lettuce spears, garbanzo beans, red and yellow tomato chunks, cucumbers, feta cheese triangles, croutons and topped off with shredded parmesan.
The salad was drizzled with a lemon vinaigrette which I was most excited about however it was just a bit too sweet for my taste.
As mentioned before it was difficult to cut into the spears without contents of my salad spilling onto the table so in the end I just picked up the spears with my hands and ate it that way, not a big deal but messy nonetheless.
During my meal I noticed how attentive the wait staff was, constantly checking on our party and others in our area.
At one point a manager even came over to introduce herself to us.
I realized why at the end when we were paying, inside of their bill placards they have an iTouch installed so patrons can take surveys about their experience at the restaurant.
Note: Total Rewards members get a discount on various items on the menu, if you don't have one - they're free so go get one.

My favorite food might be hot wings and this place has buffalo style fries!
Not just fries with hot sauce on it but thick sliced potato chips tangled up and they bring you a great serving of hot sauce in a shot glass you can pour on the potatoes yourself .
The blue cheese dip for the fries was great too and I'm not big on blue cheese.
Also got some drunken fish tacos but I would go back for those fries alone.
Good presentation was great, prices were not bad it's a good place I would recommend.
We sat outside, it was fun to people watch!

I am a big fan of Guy, so when I happen to be standing right in front of his new restaurant in Vegas, I had to try it.
We couldn't settle on just one beer, so we went with the recommendation of the bartender and got the Flight to Flavortown.
It is 16 taster beers.
What a great idea.
If you finish all of the beers, you get a free t-shirt.
Of course, I got a free t-shirt.
:) To go with the beer, I wanted to try the lollipop wings that were also recommended.
The bartender mentioned that they were not hot, just had a nice kick.
She was a liar.
They were on fire hot.
Amazing, but hot.
I can still taste the sauce.
Served with wasabi, blue cheese dressing and celery sticks, this was a fantastic dish.
I highly suggest having these!

I really wanted to like this restaurant as I like Guy's TV show but I was nervous as some restaurants get by on name alone.
As Guys would say "this is on point.
" The service was excellent, our server Ayron was on top of every request.
I had the mac & cheese bacon burger.
As many other reviews say it is messy and then the plate it comes on is way too small.
The fries that come with the burger are of different shapes-; from waffle to shoestring to fatter fries.
The burger was good not amazing but I was happy.
The drinks come with real is cubes in the shape of ancube, which is kinda cool.
The burger was a bit over priced at $20.
I will be back if I'm near the Quad but wouldn't go out of my way to eat here.

I remember hearing that Guy Fieri had opened a new restaurant in Vegas, and as we were walking by the Quad I saw this place and new I had to try it.
My friends are always willing to try new places so we went in.
There was a pretty long line, which led me to think it would be a long wait, but we were seated shortly after.
We had two waitresses that took care of our table.
One took the order and brought out the food, and the other was for drinks.
This is something new to me, but was glad it worked out great.
I had my drinks refilled my times without having to ask for a refill.
On to the food, our table ordered fireball whisky wings, double barrel bbq wings, triple t fries, and the mac and cheese bacon cheeseburger.
The wings are like a lollipop style so sizes do vary.
Unfortunately, ours were on the smaller size.
We got a wing/pop that was a size of a quarter.
The fireball wings does have a spicy kick to it.
Not overwhelmingly spicy but leaves a tingle.
Flavor was pretty good.
The double barrel bbq wing is pretty normal.
The mac and cheese burger was ginormous.
Good luck taking a bite out of this one.
I had to use a fork and knife to eat this burger.
I ordered it medium but it came out well done.
Was not cooked to order.
Wished the mac and cheese would were more cheesy.
Overall, the burger was a bit dry and lacking in flavor.
They have a beer challenge here if you can drink their flight sampler under a certain amount of time, you will win a t-shirt.
We didn't do it because we were already full after eating.
Service is great here even while they are extremely busy.
Prices are a little bit on the expensive side for burgers and wings.

The food is good, but the service is meh.
They also don't have a children's menu, which is a little weird.

Went to Guy Fieri's last night as our last meal of Vegas before flying home this morning.
The triple t (truffle) fries were delicious.
They came with a truffle dipping sauce and we were also served wing sauce for dipping.
Our was a big plate that fed 4.
We almost ordered seconds to accompany our Mac and cheese burgers but were pleased by the assorted fries that came with the meal.
We split the 2 burgers in half and this was able to fill the four of us as well.
The only thing that I was a little disappointed by was that my particular burger didn't seem to have the same hardy portion of mac and cheese as my friends did and it was hard for me to really taste the macaroni (it was still good though).
Also, we were a little disappointed to be told they had run out of the pepperoni fondue dippers that we ordered (I also heard the table behind us ordered something behind us that they ran out of).
I guess that's what happens when you try to order "dinner" at midnight.

The service was decent.
Took about 10 minutes to get us our drink order.
I ordered the ceasar salad with this obnoxious crouton bowl that service no purpose.
It was so hard I couldn't even cut through with a steak knife.
I also had the sashimi taco, that was good and light.
My fiance had mac n cheese bacon burger, it was messy, the meat fell a part and the bun was the size of a silver dollar.
With the burger you get a side of fries... these aren't just regular fries, they are a variety of fries consist of steak fries, shoe string, crinkle fries, etc.
My fiance started calling it left over fries, which what they tasted like.
However, there, this one amazing item in this menu that I truly enjoyed.. the truffle fries.
Simply delicious.
The aioli was well done.
Overall, decent experience,.giving them the benefit of the doubt they just opened.

I am right on the cusp of a 4-star review, unfortunately the service we received knocked it down to a 3-star.
We went there on May 12th for my 30th birthday, this was my choice and I did not even complain when we had to wait 10-15min for an outdoor table when we could've been seated right away inside.
The girls at the front were all wicked nice and greeted us right away and were helpful.
There was a band playing next door so it did make conversation a little difficult but nothing too bad, and the people watching was the best part of being outside.
The food for the most part was delicious.
I got a Smoke & Mirrors for my drink, which besides the giant pepper on the glass was delicious.
For appetizers we got Righteous Rojo Rings and Guy-talian Fondue Dippers, the sauce for the rings was awesome nice and spicy.
The dippers were also wicked good, my mom started making them at home, just can't get the dip right!
For my meal I got Carne Asada Street Tacos, which were okay.
The filling was very good but the thing I did not like was that the tacos seemed to be wrapped with two soft taco shells which were really really really dry.
The best part was the dessert, the Triple Doublemint Pie, which was shared amongst all four of us because it was definitely too large for one person.
Our server is what killed this whole experience.
I am not sure where she kept on disappearing to but she brought our drinks and then ran off for almost 20min before taking any part of our order.
Then after our meal it took awhile before she even asked if we wanted to dessert (which I did, come on it was my birthday!).
My mom did ask several times for a glass of water which she never brought over.
She was more concerned with other tables around us with whom she could flirt with (apparently my husband and dad are unflirtable?
), and we tip well as long as you pay attention and are a good server.
All in all it was a great place and next time I am back in Vegas I will definitely go back.

Great restaurant Guy.
Ate there in June and loved it.
The chicken wraps are AWESOME and the burgers...any of them are fantastic!
Guy, Nick the waiter looks like he'd be your son/brother.
You taught them well.
If you go to Vegas and don't eat there, you're a moron.
Guy, open one in Houston please.

Let me say this, I came in twice to this restaurant because I freakin' love burgers.
Both times I was seated at the full service bar.
The first night Christina helped me.
She was very friendly and outgoing.
If I needed anything she was right there.
I ordered the Triple B Burger.
It was phenomenal.
One of the best burgers I've had.
It came with a small sampling of four different fries.
The fries weren't bad but nothing to write home about.
At the end of my meal I was asked to fill out a short survey which I was sure would be thrown out because I answered so positively about her.
The food service was quick and I enjoyed my visit.
Enough to come back the very next day even.
Now the next visit I came in around the same time and was again seated at the full service bar.
This time however the service was less than par.
I sat on my stool for a solid five minutes before being handed a menu.
One bartender spent this entire time talking to his friend that were sitting next to me.
I knew they were friends because he knew their names and talked about what they posted on Facebook.
The bartender that finally helped me though barely looked at me other than to take my menu.
I ordered the Mac n Cheese Bacon Burger which came out fairly quickly.
Again the burger was incredible, just as I expected.
I have nothing bad to say about the food.
However, while eating I finished my drink and despite sitting right at the bar it took nearly ten minutes to be refilled.
I finished my meal and had to wait between five and ten minutes before I could ask for the check.
This time I wasn't asked to fill out a survey (probably because even they knew the service was poor.
)  I'll consider coming back, but will be on the look out for Christina or I'll wait for a table.

Great service, and the drink Smoke and Mirrors is super good!
The food was great too

This is a great place high energy staff helpful.
I had the Sashimi won-tacos love them followed by the The Guy-talian Deli salad this was great the mix of Italian meats and the crown of prosciutto-wrapped smoked provolone!
make this a must for the flavor town finale I had a S'more Monte Cristo  loved it will go back and try the Cheesecake challenge soon highly recommend this place to everyone

I really wanted to enjoy this place, but it failed me on so many different levels.
The initial problem was the long wait (approximately 1-1 1/2 hours).
Once we finally got seated the environment was very loud and hectic.
It was hard to hear the rest if our party without yelling back and forth.
The menu was very small and everything was very pricey for the quality of food they were serving.
I ordered the Mac and cheese burger and expected a lot of flavor, all I got was a mediocre burger that had some flavorless macaroni on top of it.
My wife ordered the street tacos and for $20 they brought out a few tiny tacos that didn't compare to a local taco shop that would give you 20 of them that were bigger, better, and full of flavor for the same price.
Definitely another tourist trap with a celebrity name on it like many of the other ones on the strip.
Won't be returning here sadly, but I'm sure many will ignore this review and try out the waters for themselves.

Our friends who were on vacation went, then demanded we join them the next night!
It was great!!
The Tuna Tacos were bomb, the onion ring rack was unlike any I've ever eaten.
Our server Luis was fun, friendly, and on point.
The assistant mgr.
stopped by to welcome us.
Good atmosphere, amazing flavors, fair prices...it's a new must try.
We will be back...soon!

This place is off the Hook!
All of the food was excellent.
Service was perfect and the beer was cold.
Great atmosphere with the music from the Carnival Court.
Good price and great portions.

Carne asada street tacos were phenomenal and the service was excellent (Great job, Daniel B.).
We had our food very quickly and everything was delicious.

This place was great!
Everyone in my family ordered something different and we all loved our food (party of 5).
I will definitely be going back next time we are in Vegas!

I really was hoping to like Guy Fieri's restaurant.
It is not bad, by any means.
It is a good burger.
The food is good.
The decor is good.
The service is good.
But that is the problem.
It's all just "good.
"  There was nothing that will make me want to go back.
I have been to Burger Bar (quite a few times), as well as Gordon Ramsey's burger place at PH.
I have to say that Burger Bar is quite a bit better.
The prices are comparable, but the fact of customization you can do at Burger Bar made it better for me.
The prices were average for Vegas, but high for a burger place located anywhere else.
What I liked the best about Guy Fieri is that fries come with the burger, and they give you a variety of all the fries.
A great idea and very much appreciated.
If you are in the mood to splurge on the K-cals, go ahead and give Guy Fieri a try.
Unfortunately, it just didn't blow my mind for an amazing meal.

I had the mac n cheese burger with fries.
My friends ordered the tacos, wings & lettuce wrap.
This place is pretty hyped up and overpriced for the quality of food.
My burger didn't have any special flavor to it.
Just a burger and they slapped some mac n cheese in the middle in place of a regular cheese.
I could have gone to In n Out or Five Guys Burger for half the price and some free peanuts.
What a disappointment.
I'll give 2 stars cause our server was really pleasant.

My wife and I went to this place on a Friday after seeing some good reviews and knowing that it's located on a very nice spot, close to a nighclub, so we could eat while paying attention to the nearby people.
My wife ordered a Mac and Cheese Bacon Burger and I got a Original Smash-Burger.
We both agreed that this was a overly expensive burger for its quality.
The burger seemed huge in size, but you'll notice that the burger patty is very thin actually, the big size of the burger is basically because they use a bunch of cabbage and the bun in tall, you can confirm that from other people's photos here at Yelp.
The fries that came with the burger were a joke, they were probably worse than McDonald's, and came with a ketchup-like (which was probably just ketchup) sauce.
The drink my wife ordered (named Smoke and mirrors) tasted and looked great.
Service was good, nothing really special about it.
We will never go back or recommend.

Service!!!
I can see guy's influence all over this place.
My boyfriend and I ordered the fondue dippers for an app and I ordered the chicken tacos and my boyfriend ordered the beef dip sandwich.
Our food arrived and we never got our app.
I was very disappointed because I ordered the lighter meal of chicken tacos because we were getting a heavy app.
I told the waiter and he was very apologetic.
I told him to just forget the app but he insisted on bringing them anyway FREE of charge.
Then the manager showed up and apologized.
I have to say the food was great and they redeemed themselves so well my boyfriend and I went back again a few days later!
P.s.
The small wooden style plates are waaaaay too small to hold the big and somewhat messy food.

Great service, unique style of cooking your traditional American food, and a fun environment!!!
5 stars is a easy option for me.
Will definitely be back to try their onion rings & dessert next time!
Well done Guy

This place was awesome Instead of people watching we couldn't stop staring at all the food coming out going to other peoples tables.
Great presentation and our nachos were perfect bite on every chip, even the ones at the bottom.
Tacos just as yummy , lots of food, friendly smiling service .
Can't go wrong here !

On our one-week vacation to Vegas, we visited Guy's restaurant twice...I'd say we liked it ;) The first time we went around dinner time so we had to sit outside in the Vegas heat, but the food made up for it!
We started with the sashimi won-tacos.
These must have been our favorite thing we ate in Vegas.
The raw tuna with the crispy shell were the perfect combo.
We then moved on to the Original smash burger and mac and cheese burger.
They were both huge and great.
Also came with a side of fries (I really recommend they write this on the menu because we didn't think we were getting any and were thinking of ordering a separate side).
The seasoning on the fries was so good.
It had a spicy kick with a hint of sweetness.
The cocktails are also great.
They are so different that the waiter had to explain them all to me to get a sense of what I was ordering.
Our second trip, we had Nick L for lunch.
He is the best server, so ask for him!
He gave us great recommendations and was spot on.
This time we tried the shrimp tacos and BBQ wings.
Again, great.
Prices are also unbeatable, especially on the strip.
I highly recommend this spot for lunch or dinner, burgers or wings.

Off the chain, best Vegas meal in last 2 trips.
Pizza dippers outstanding.
Mac & cheese burger with fries is delicious.
Ate at bar with service that was excellent.
I'm sold, will be back

Last Saturday we had lunch here and it was just OK!
Now I can say I have been there!!!!!
The only reason I give it two stars is because our waitress was great!
You have to order exactly what is on the menu... We asked for onion rings instead of fries and they said "NO".
You have to pay $14 for onion rings no substitutions!
I tasted my friends burger with blue cheese and I have never had something more disgusting than that!!!
I tasted the burger with the pastrami and the description on the menu was better than the burger!
I had the chili with corn bread... Marie Callender's is better for half the price.
The food looks great but the taste is not worth the money nor the million calories that Guy's food packs!
There are thousands of places in Las Vegans that are much  better than this place!
Have a drink, enjoy the experience and eat somewhere else!

God dammit.
My girlfriend and I went here cuz we think guy is a total tool and seriously doubted his ability to come up with a good menu and wanted to mock him basically (as lovingly as possible, of course).
don't get us wrong we love his shows on food network we just figured his over cheeeeeezy personality wasn't capable of such goodness.
we ended up going back the last day of our trip.
parmaggeden wings were awesome, triple t fries were awesome, motley que was awesome, and the best thing we had was the awesome mac n cheese burger.
i use awesome so many times cuz guy always does.
will be returning here next time.

Never post but this Place is off the charts good.
Great atmosphere, casual and fun.
The burger i had was called the off da hook burger and it was!!
Go check it out.

Went with family for a birthday.
We got the parm wings,  fireball whiskey wings, mac and cheese bacon burger and the cheesecake.
The food was GREAT.
The only thing pulling them down are the serbers.
We had to ask 5 tomes for lemons for water and waited a good 15 for a taster for beer.
Would recommend this because of the food just do not expect good service

We had the truffle fries, the Victors Street Tacos and the carne Asada tacos.
The fries were really good.
The tacos are pretty small, but you get four, so that good.
The Victors tacos were really good, but we didn't care for the carne Asada.
The drinks were watered down but we weren't charged for them so no foul there.
Our waiter was tripping on something.
We had a good laugh all night watching this guy.
He couldn't stay focused long enough to take or drink order.
Look, we went into this knowing it is a "gimmick" joint that brings you in just because you saw this guy on t.v.
and he told you where to get those really good donuts in Texas should you ever be unfortunate enough to find yourself in Texas.
Also, we know that being on The Strip we'd be paying a premium.
If this were any other location I'd be ticked at the whole experience.
This place is as average as Applebees and Chili's.

Hands down the best service on the strip!
Chef tony was sooooo attentive to our needs and paid so much attention to detail.
Spent WAY more time with us than he needed to and his genuine passion for food made this experience one we will never forgot!!!
Best burgers on the strip for sure!!
We will definitely be back and tell everyone we know!!!!
Be sure to ask if you have an allergy because if he can find a way he will!!

Food was amazing and just the right portions.
Wait staff was great and attentive and very personable.
Only downside I would say was the wait time just to check in.
Also they didn't seem like their tech was making things go any faster with managing tables and customers in or outbound.
It actually seemed to hinder the operation.

Best server at this place is CHRIS ANDERSON!!!
in all seriousness ask for a reservation with him you will be impressed!!
He really knows his stuff and gave me & my fianc an amazing experience.
He has an in depth knowledge of the menu and the beers that are offered & I'm glad we had him as our server!
Thank you chris!!
AMAZING!!
We walked in with no reservation & was lucky enough to be seated right away in his section.
We ordered the 16 beer flight which was more then enough for 2 people & we also ordered the onion rings to start which are a bit spicy (it was more the spicy ketchup that comes with it not the actual onion rings that was spicy) and we also ordered the mayor burger & came back the next day to try the fireball whiskey wings.
everything tasted great except I do agree with other reviews I read about the fries, there wasn't too many & the wings are a bit small however the flavors were great & I'm glad i experienced this place!
We also got a free t-shirt for ordering the beer flight which was cool but if i could suggest anything i would ask to keep the menu simple and work on a theme for this place.
The menu is a little corny since it uses a lot of words you think Guy would say on his triple D show when describing the food he's eating.
Just keep it simple!
Read the menu and you will understand what I'm talking about....Hope to see you again chris!

This was hands down the best place I have ever eaten!
I was not disappointed in any way here.
The restaurant:  The atmosphere is very fun and very much like Guy.
The staff is dressed in denim outfits with leather like vests/aprons.
The tables, silverware and layout have a modern industrial type feeling.
The kitchen is very open to the restaurant so you can just look in and see exactly what's going on in there (a well oiled machine).
There is also a mini shop in the front to buy various things from him and the restaurant.
We ended up buying one of the bandana like napkin towels that are on the table.
The food:  This was the best food I've had in a long time!
Certainly the best on the strip.
In any price class.
It came out very fast and was presented extremely well.
The fries are a mix of all types and seasoned to perfection.
The burgers are moist and flavorful.
Try the Mac-n-cheese bacon burger and you won't want anything else.
The pulled pork was so good and on a pretzel bun it was over the top.
The drink selection was awesome and they had a little something for whatever you're looking for.
Overall:  Extremely pleased at my whole experience at this eatery.
I went straight to flavor town and never looked back.
Go and enjoy yourself!

AMAZING......
I am a wings lover had wings here.... And now i cannot have wings anywhere and be satisfied.....plz go on ur first day to vegas.
Dont repent it going on the last day like me... Really cheap compared to a signature restaurant.

Honestly, this is probably the best Vegas celebrity chef restaurant experience we have had!
Great food and Guy Fieri, if you read these, Chris was our server and he does you proud!!!
Perhaps the best service I have ever experienced!
Top notch and fun!!!
Outstanding!!

Great food & great service  We had the Mac & Cheese Bacon Burger - so tasty!!!
Worth every penny  The Drunken Fish Tacos were also great.
The cilantro and house sauce work great together.
My glass of water was never empty, they were very attentive about refills.

HIGHLY RECCOMEND GREAT FOOD, GREAT SERVICE AND FUN ATMOSPHERE.
We had a party of 14 their for a special occasion, management was over the top helpful in getting us a table and taking care of us.
Our waiter Ray couldn't be more on top of it with recommendations for food, drinks and appetizers.
Guy you did this place up right with the food, service, management and waiting staff.
Cant wait to come back

Food was great.
Fries were the best.
Wasn't a fan of the sauce the truffle fries came with.
I was a little confused with my order but it was good none the less.
I ordered the triple b burger that came with blue cheese.
no where on the menu did it say it was a chicken burger.
I got my burger and it was a chicken burger with gouda cheese.
It tasted fine but I'm not sure where the confusion was... Want to try the dessert next time!

Place feels exactly like I imagine Guy Fieri, lots of flare, very little substance.
My friend and I stopped by on our way out of Vegas and were extremely disappointed.
Starving and walking away with money in our pockets we were ready for one last great meal before we returned to the daily grind, should have gone somewhere else.
Service was eh in the beginning, 14 empty tables and the hostess tried telling us that they had no seats available.
A manager came up and yelled at the poor hostess in front of us.
After being seated, our waitress was extremely friendly and the only good thing about my experience here.
We both ordered the Sashimi Won-Tacos and Drunken Fish Tacos.
They were dry and underwhelming, Guy is all about flavor and sauces and spices and his food was awful!
I would never eat here again and cant even watch Diners anymore, how can I trust someone who can't make a decent fish taco?

TOURIST TRAP!!!!!BEWARE!!!!!
After having been to so many DDD establishments I truly believed that I would be in for a foodie experience.....was I wrong!
Although it's new I will give the service a serious break and not be to harsh on them knowing that service gets better with time.
An app of Truffle fries, Hamburger and Fish Tacos washed down with a beer and cocktail should not be $100 but I get it it's the strip.
The food certainly had great presentation hence the second star....However the Taste is the true disappointment, or should I say lack of taste.
Even Guy has said that your fish should not smell fishy...I will not ramble but hope that before you walk in thinking it's a foodie paradise you think twice......

I decided to take my girlfriend out to dinner last night.
I heard about Guys kitchen and finally wanted to try it out.
Already having the munchies, I medicated even more in the car, expecting a wait.
I was wrong.
Higher than the High Roller itself, I walked in and was greeted by a beautiful hostess.
We waited for what seemed like less than a minute, before we were called for our seats.
(I like how you could see the open kitchen when you're being seated.
)   The menus were clipped to what seemed like oversized, thick clipboards.
The menu  was simple and easily understood with a good amount of items.
We started with drinks.
"Lemon drop...Not!
" for her and a Firestone Union Jack IPA for me.
I don't usually drink lemon drops (only when I try hers) but I have to say it was the best one I've had so far.
We decided on the Drunken Fish Tacos, Triple T Fries, Ultimate Asian Chicken Wraps and the Mac + Cheese Bacon Burger.
The Triple T fries and Drunken Fish tacos were served first.
The Triple T fries were amazing!
Truffle chunks, truffle infused Gouda and a creamy truffle sauce.
Bachi who?
They don't skimp here!
The Drunken Fish tacos were on another level.
They consist of lightly grilled tequila-citrus tilapia, cabbage and avocado.
Then topped with radish and pickled ginger for a tasty combination.
Soon after, the Ultimate Asian Chicken Wraps and Mac + Cheese Bacon burger were heading to our table.
The Ultimate Asian Chicken wraps are a must try.
The Chinese minced chicken was on point.
You also get three spring rolls and two Thai style skewers.
It's also a good way to be romantic, making your date lettuce wraps.
Just make sure your hands are washed!
Now onto the burger.
The Six Cheese Mac + Cheese Bacon burger was bombdotcom.
Hands down one of the best burgers I've had.
Mac + Cheese flowing over the thick applewood bacon all between a toasted garlic brioche bun.
Accompanied with a  combination of potato wedges, crisscut and regular fries.
I was already full from finishing the previous dishes so I only ate half and have to pack the rest.
Next time I won't order as much so we could get dessert.
Overall the experience was fantastic!
Service was outstanding!
Food was amazing!
I WILL be coming back again, and again.

My husband and I just returned from a week in Vegas.
We wanted a variety of good meals, but were continually let down by Gordon Ramsey's, bobby Flays and Wolfgang pucks.
We ended up eating at Guys three times!
Great atmosphere, servers were attentive and excellent, and the food, just WOW!
I can't lie , the Sushimi Won Tacos kept bringing us back!
So fresh and the taste was amazing, the Whisky chicken wings, the Italian salad, just amazing.
And last but no least, the cheesecake, out of this world.
HIGHLY RECOMMENDED  And the prices are some of the best we had paid in Vegas.
And the service was awesome.
Guy!
Great place!
Keep it up

Just came back from 5 days in Vegas.
Went to Guy Fieri's for dinner our 2nd to last night.
No one finished their dinner.
Presentation was good if not over the top.
Fries were delicious, nachos were good.
Burgers were laden with so many things the bottom bun was soaked to the point where it fell apart.
The worst part was the horrible gut wrenching bowel movements that followed it.
Two people didn't even last til the check came and I, your courteous narrator, almost crapped my pants on fremont st. twice.
The drenching sweats that came along with the cramping was the cherry on the sundae.
If you eat here you better give yourself 30 - 45 minutes in your hotel room just in case...

Great place to eat.
I had the bacon Mac and cheese burger and it is huge!
But sooooo good.
The wait was not long for lunch and the service was great.
Will definitely be returning next time in Vegas.

Awesome Service great Staff ask for Nick!
Worth the visit not only for the food but for the hospitality!

Great food!
You can really tell this is guy's restaurant his touch is everywhere I just wish there was a little more space between tables,  feels like you're eating with strangers but other than that the food and service was great!

Wanted to give this place a try and see if it was any good.
As Las Vegas is known for many chefs that open restruants he on the strip or in one of the major casinos.
Well this on is next to the Quad by the Linqs and the new high roller.
Once we sat down and got our service it was below average at best.
Server we had was not very accommodating and seems like the attitude was coming.
I ordered the off the hook burger it was oil and sloppy.
My other party ordered the Mac and Cheese burger this one was dry and had no flavor at all.
A side of Mac and Cheese for my baby, ate one bite and didn't want it.
Other kid places that have mac and cheese he love, and this is suppose to be good?
Not good for kids!
No kids menu is offered at this place.
too expensive to order for a kid or child and not worth it.
Female server was not helpful as I stated earlier.
I ordered iced tea and I had to ask for a refill and it took forever to come back with that refill.
I've ate at many burger places and other have not even disappointed like this one.
At lease if the service was superior like it should of been anyways.
at least my rating on this establishment  would of been better than a one starer.
But a double whammy killed it on the head!!!!

I was in Vegas with my family for my birthday.
We all went to Guy Fieri's restaurant for dinner.
I had the drunken tacos, they were delicious!
I'll go to the restaurant again when I'm in Vegas for certain.

Very impressed by the unique menu.
We ended up getting the fireball whiskey wings and a burger..
Both were amazing!!
Best food I've had here in Vegas.
The plates were very appealing.
Extremely attentive service!
They were busy but our food came out quick.
I highly recommend this if you are interested in some tasty food at a reasonable price.

Food is delicious!!!
Very good service!!!
Michael Speagle, general manager of the restaurant, was very nice and helpful.
Our waiter Brittany Horton was very helpful with food order recommendations!!!
Thank you!!!
Will visit again for sure!!

What an amazing restaurant with amazing staff!!
They accommodated a party of 14 for My Son's 21st bday.
The food was delicious, and  the service was top notch!!
Michael the manger  and our waiter Ray were so attentive and really made My sons celebration one that he will never forget!

The food was decent.
We had wings, shrimp and steak tacos and fried s'mores dessert.
The wings were so good.
Tacos were ok, and our dessert was not good at all.
Service was a little below average, our waiter was the one that recommend the dessert.

Okay so I'm giving this place a three after reading many of your reviews but I hope to upgrade it in the future.
So here's why I'm giving it a three.
I did go there on a Saturday night so I expected it to be busy but I went there after a show so it was pretty late.
When we got there the hostess told us it would be a 40 minute wait.
40 minutes okay so we decided to eat at the bar.
There was nothing wrong with that we met some friendly people at the bar and the bartender/our server was great.
However as we watched two empty tables the entire night we started to question the 40 minute wait quote.
We did the cheesecake challenge and it was good but maybe because I make a phenomenal cheesecake I was pretty disappointed.
I did note that many of the appetizer seem like comfort foods and I can't wait to go back.
The vibe of the restaurant was pretty good and I think if they can get their kinks worked out it'll be fine.

not gonna lie went here cus the food looks instagram worthy.. and it was.
restaurant is located in the quad, the side closest to harris.
The wait time for 5 people on a saturday edc weekend wasn't that bad about 30-45mins.
The host was very accommodating since i changed from 8 people to 5 people to different phone number cus i didn't have any reception so thank you for not judging me  I ordered the fondue, sashimi tacos, and truffle fries.
Our waiter was kind of out of it, i think it was just him cus after he went on break the service was a got a lot better.
The fondue dip was amazing, i'd be taking whatever my friends had and dipping it in that shit.
The breadsticks didn't really taste like anything and the pepperoni wasn't too over powering which i thought was kind of nice.
I thought the sashimi tacos were hella good, that wasabi sour cream sauce whatever it was hella did it for me, now if only they were bigger.
Truffle fries, the menu says there's no such thing as too much truffle, but nawww there is.
That truffle aioli was definitely doing too much and they came out kind of cold, but then again that could've just been our waiter cus it was the last thing to arrive at our table.
overall i'd definitely come back and try a burger

Was not impressed at all.
My husband and I split the turkey burger and mac & cheese burger.
The turkey burger was cold but otherwise tasty.
The mac & cheese burger was not seasoned well and very bland.
Service was horrible.
Our waitress was in la-la land.
She explained the menu but took forever to take our order and re-fill our waters.
We will not return.

Food was incredibly flavorful.
We had the burger, Greek salad, and bbq chicken wings.
Every single ingredient was fresh and tasted well balanced with heat and flavor.
Easily shared meals with the portion size.
The staff works to the bone and demonstrated a lot of pride with the presentation and service.

The reason for two stars:  Food- just ok, the easy things like fries, street tacos and wings are good, you would have to be absolutely terrible to ruin things like these.
The burgers have no flavor.
Service - Waited a very long time for a greeting by our server, ordered non alcoholic drinks that also took a very long time to arrive, and I even had to get up and try and find my server just to see if our party could place a food order.
Our party had a sense that our server was strongly pushing us to order alcoholic  drinks.
I expected a lot more from this place based on the name.
Myself and my dining party were very disappointed.
Food C Service D Atmosphere D   I would not recommend.

I ate the Shrimp Tacos which were very good and I will order again.
My boyfriend ordered the Mac and Cheese Burger.
I want a huge fan of that one and would not order again but it's a popular one.
It might just be my tastebuds that couldn't appreciate the burger.
The next day we  went back for dessert.
We tried the Mexican Churros.
I was honestly pretty disappointed.
I was really hoping for the best Churros ever.
Instead I got long pieces of over fried dough that was too crunchy and just fell apart.
Next time I'll try something different.
Over all, I love Guy Fieri and loved his restaurant.
Oh....almost forgot!
YOU MUST TRY THE FRIES.
I they're the Vegas fries.
Not sure but they have a white cream on the side and I think they are covered in parmesan and parsley.
Absolutely delicious!

Holy crap this place was good.
My wife and I were in Vegas for a couple of days and walked in to this place because we were super hungry.
I didn't know what kind of food they had, so I was very excited when I saw their burgers and sandwiches on nearby plates.
I had the mayor of flavor-town burger.
Burger meat with pastrami on a pretzel bun!?
Oh man.
It was so flavorful, juicy and amazing.
The server recommended it to me.
The fries were good too!
My wife had a pork sandwich that I stole a bite of.
That was very tasty.
I really should have gotten their onion rings!
They looked bomb!
I'd come back!

Excellent food and exceptional service.
Our server, Ray, was great.
Very attentive and gave great recommendations.
The manager even stooped by to check on our experience.
He had a delicious beer (can't remember the name) and I had the Monkey Wrench..
YUM!!
We started with the Triple T fries, seriously, ridiculously amazing!
I ordered the drunken fish tacos, and he had the original smash burger..again, amazing.
We finished with the fried ice cream sundae.
Wow.

As with anyone were big fans of guy and couldn't wait to eat his food.
We came we ate we left happier than ever.
Huge portions.
Good flavor.
Just loved our time there.

Went to Guy's to celebrate a birthday.
Not worth the hype.
Won't return, nor recommend to friends.
Really wanted to like this place.
Service slow.
Had fly bugging everyone the whole time.
Guess they can't afford fly fans to keep the flies on the patio.

this place was awesome.
the best eal I had in vegas.

Pretty disappointing.
Dry fish tacos - also pricey, no side.
Burgers, french dip and chili were pretty good but also nothing too special despite the price.
Service was good, but came with several very heavy handed hard sells at the end of the meal for shots.
Solid "meh".

Loved it!
I got the Mac n cheese burger and it was out of this world insanely awesome!
Burger, bacon, cheese and Mac and cheese...how could u not love it.
My hubby got fish tacos and they were awesome.
You must get bloody Mary's to drink!

Went the day before and asked if my wife could eat there with her peanut and tree nut allergy and they said she could.
Went back the next day and they basically said there wasn't anything she could eat that would be 100% safe.
That was our cue not to try anything but my wife insisted I try something as this was going to be one of the highlights of the trip.
So disgruntled I tried the General wings.
They were more sweet than spicy.
Had the look of sweet and sour sauce.
The majority of general tso sauce I've had is more brown in color.
It was OK but wouldn't go out of my way for them.
They had a sandwich I wanted to try but with the allergy situation I was really disappointed my wife couldn't join me in a meal.
Come on Guy you are in Vegas you should know how to deal with allergies.
Triple D= disappointment!
disgruntled and down right lacking in flavor town.

I was very excited to try this restaurant especially since me and my five year old watch the show all the time.
So let me give my honest review.. Pros: Great Atmosphere , great staff and nice presentation of food.
I loved the great music coming from the promenade, that was tons of fun!!
While waiting.on my food I mingled with other guest checking out their food which looked good, this alone got me excited Cons: Quality was lacking I ordered truffle fries which was very greasy to the point it looked under cooked ( just bad) my husband got a burger and for $18 I expected more burger it was a really thin patty, our waiter told us they were all the same size.
( we wanted the biggest one) we brought our son and of course there was no kids menu or anything priced cheap enough to buy for a child.
I also thought the menu was just lacking of different options.
I actually left feeling sad and disappointed b/c I begged my husband to take me here all week and this just did not make the grade.
What a disappointment!!
However since im local I will give it another try in a few months maybe they will work some of the kinks out.
Im a believer of giving second chances

I am the hardest burger criticizer...but damn their burger with mac and cheese was so goood.
so much flavor.
I have been to Bachi burger, BRGR at PH, and Holsteins, and this beats them all.
I even cameback the next day and tried the one with pastrami on it....AMAZING.....they cook the burgers to my taste buds.
I also had the cheesecake.....that was ok....but presentation on both was a 10...definitely will comeback to this place when i got to Vegas again

I was highly disappointed when I realized that the restaurant wasn't a bbq restaurant (I don't know why I thought it was a bbq restaurant it just had that look and feel of a bbq restaurant).
We decided to stay since we were already there, I was starving and it was 112 degrees outside.
Our waiter, Chris Anderson was seriously THE BEST WAITER I've EVER had!!!
He was witty, extremely informative of the menu, very attentive and had wonderful recommendations.
We ordered the amazingly delicious hand battered onion rings that came with a sriracha ketchup dip (soooooo good)!
We also had french fries smothered in buffalo sauce and blue cheese crumbles.
Now let me say, I hate blue cheese but the fries, buffalo sauce and blue cheese crumbles all went together so well.
Lastly, we order a bbq burger with all the toppings the bread literally melted in your mouth, it was phenomenal.
I'm so glad we decided to stay the food was great, the atmosphere was great and the service was outstanding.
I've been recommending this place to anyone and everyone who will listen!!

It's everything you would expect from Guy.
Outstanding.
Huge burgers full of innovative flavors and sauce combinations.
I had the turkey burger and have been back twice to order it again.
You won't be disappointed.
Delicious.
If you like Guy, you will love this place.

Went there thid weekend.
Amazing burgers.
Best I have had.
My husband ordered shrimp tacos, a little small.
Order the burgers servers was amazing...

This place has something for everyone.
We went here twice during our Vegas stay and I was pretty pleased with both meals.
Once was for a late night snack, the other lunch.
For the late night snack, we got the Sashimi Won-Ton Tacos.
These were delicious and possibly one of the highlights of the menu!
The wrappers were in the shape of taco shells and were perfect!
Super light and crispy.
The filling was ahi tuna with a mango salsa- delicious!
We ordered the Fried Ice Cream dessert and I was pretty disappointed with the fried part- it was actually pretty soggy and instead of being crispy- it actually was more chewy- not what I had hoped for.
It did come with a considerable amount of sides to top with it to make it your own- but I wouldn't order that one again.
The second meal we had here I tried the carne asada tacos.
You get 4 small tacos to an order, which is a good portion size.
They were great and came with two salsa options.
There was a good portion of steak in each of the tacos and a yummy cabbage slaw on top.
The Quad hotel gave us a free coupon for Vegas fries- so we tried those too--- think steak type fries meets buffalo wings.
The bleu cheese dressing is pretty over whelming- I went for ranch instead.
Overall, the service is pretty good, the staff is welcoming and generally attentive.
You even have the opportunity to do a digital survey (There's an I-touch in the bill folio) at the end of your meal to give feedback.
The portion sizes can be pretty huge- make sure you go in hungry if you're ordering entrees!

Surprisingly good for such a touristy place on the strip.
Asian lettuce wraps were good, as were the truffle fries.
Chicken tacos and the pulled pork sandwich were just ok.
I wanted to try the whole menu, which was well-written and funny.
Service was good with a smile, the manager was walking around, and we were able to sit outside right by the carnival court outdoor live music.
I would consider returning.

Went here twice!
Long story short, food was amazeballs.
Try it out if you're in Vegas!
Long story short made long: (First visit) - My boyfriend and I were walking from Wynn's to grab some burgers at Gordon Ramsay's when we stumbled on this place.
It was hot (what an understatement) and so we didn't want to walk any further so we decided to try this place out.
Best decision of the trip!
We shared an Original Smash Burger which came with their Quad Fries.
Pretty damn good.
We were both happy with our midnight snack and happily walked back to our hotel in the blistering heat--content, to say the least.
Oh!
And I brought my brother back a doggy bag of their Parmageddon Wings (I didn't try it myself but my brother said it was alright and wished it had more parmesan on it).
(Second visit) We were determined to go back and try more of the menu before leaving Las Vegas so my boyfriend and I dragged my family along!
The boyf and I got the Smashburger again (only this time, the waiter asked us how we wanted it cooked).
"Medium well please!
" My parents shared the Smashburger as well (well done).
And my brother got a '67 Cajun Sandwich.
We finished every bit of our entrees with the exception of the Quad Fries because we were too busy nomming on the Triple T Fries we ordered on the side.
Wait.
I need to tell you all how these fries make me feel.
"Triple T Fries," I say to myself as I roll my eyes in pure foodgasm bliss followed by a mouthwatering longing to taste these beautiful things once again.
Okay.
My party was fighting to get the most amount of these fries into our bellies.
They were so good!
Order them!
Don't be like my boyf and I the first time and say, "Ooh, these sound good.
We'll try them next time so we have a reason to come back!
" NO, ORDER THEM THEN AND THERE.
We then ended the wonderful dining experience with a S'mores Monte Cristo for dessert.
Boy, believe me when I tell you to never say, "We'll try it next time!
" when it comes to food.
"Carpe diem" should be rule number one in any foodie's rule book.
Actually, if my high school Latin has actually stuck anything in my brain, it should be "Carpe cena!
" SEIZE THE MEAL.
Anyway, dessert was a great way to end the meal even though we were full.
The chocolate and raspberry dipping sauces were the best part.
Yes to this place.
Yes to the food.
Yes to Guy Fieri.
Come through!
Totally worth every penny :)

This place is full of wonderful culinary treats and definitely has a cool, lively atmosphere.
Lots of delicious comfort food ranging from wings to tacos and mac and cheese burgers.
Not too many choices for people on low carb diets, but definitely have to say it is a fun, culinary adventure.
Oh yeah....  Best onion rings in the world!
Hands down!
Therefore.... 5 stars!!!
I am still thinking about them.

I was excited to try this place since it opened in late April.
I was finally able to try it this last weekend.
Overall, the experience was great.
The server was friendly and very nice.
She took our order and had a friendly conversation with us about food and Guy Fieri.
We ordered the "Triple T" fries and the general's wings.
It did take about 25 minutes to get our food-disappointing.
The wings were good.
A sweet, tangy, and spicy sauce with 3 dipping choices of toppings.
Lollipop style wing was easy to eat.
The "Triple T" fries were good but not the greatest truffle fries I have tried.
In my opinion and the girlfriend's opinion they were a little too greasy.
Would I try this place again?
Yeah, I'll give it another whirl.
I guess, I was just expecting a little too much from Guy.

